PARIS — Roberto Carvalho de Azevêdo of Brazil will be the next leader of the World Trade Organization, a Brazilian official said Tuesday, and will take the reins at a time when the group is fighting to remain relevant.
Representatives of the 159 W.T.O. member states, meeting in Geneva, reached consensus on Mr. Azevêdo late Tuesday afternoon, a spokeswoman for the Brazilian foreign ministry said. The organization was scheduled to make an official announcement on Wednesday.

Mr. Azevêdo, a career diplomat and Brazil’s permanent representative to the W.T.O., would be the sixth person and the first Latin American to lead the global trade body since its creation in 1995. He beat out seven other candidates for the position, including the other finalist, the former Mexican trade minister Herminio Blanco Mendoza, who had the backing of the European Union.

Mr. Azevêdo has said that his goal at the organization is “to build bridges among my peers in Geneva.” In the end, his candidacy appealed to a number of developing countries, which saw his final opponent, Mr. Blanco — who holds a Ph.D. in economics from the University of Chicago — as a favorite of the United States and other wealthy nations.

The current chief, Pascal Lamy, took office in 2005 and will step down after his second four-year term expires Sept. 1.

Petros Mavroidis, a professor of trade law at Columbia University in New York, noted that Mr. Azevêdo had an insider’s knowledge of how the W.T.O. worked, something he said might help him work out “a face-saving compromise” over the deadlocked Doha round of trade negotiations. But Mr. Mavroidis also said he was surprised that the group, facing existential doubts, had not chosen someone with more political weight, “someone like Bill Clinton.”

“They haven’t delivered anything for years,” Mr. Mavroidis said. “Mr. Azevêdo is a skillful ambassador, but I think you need someone to shake the place up. And I don’t know if he’s the one to do it.”

Mr. Azevêdo takes over at a time when the W.T.O. — established as a forum for setting global trade rules, reducing barriers to commerce and settling disputes — appears to have lost its way. Early optimism about the Doha round, which began in 2001 and which many had hoped would be the organization’s crowning achievement, has long since faded.

Mr. Lamy, a Frenchman, initially earned high marks for his efforts on the Doha round, but nations’ disagreements on agricultural subsidies, tariffs on manufactured goods and developing countries’ access to global markets, coupled with the onset of the global financial crisis, effectively killed the appetite for a global pact. Instead, major trading nations have been bargaining over deals at the regional and bilateral levels.

One of the most ambitious regional proposals is the Trans-Pacific Partnership, to link the United States, Australia, Canada, Mexico, Japan and others. More recently, the United States and the European Union have also signaled interest in a free trade agreement.

The technical complexity of both proposals, as well as opposition from numerous special interests, probably means that years of negotiations lie ahead before either yields fruit.

Some economists argue that the rapid growth of developing nations like China, Brazil and India has left the W.T.O. hopelessly out of date.

Michael Punke, the U.S. ambassador to the W.T.O., called last month for its members to make an all-out effort to take at least a small step toward regaining momentum for a multilateral deal at a trade ministers’ meeting set for Bali in December.

“Absent a course correction, the current path of talks would lead directly to failure at Bali,” Mr. Punke warned. “And if Bali fails, it is hard to imagine how Doha can succeed.”

Despite denials from Beijing, there seems little doubt that China’s computer hackers are engaged in an aggressive and increasingly threatening campaign of cyberespionage directed at a range of government and private systems in the United States, including the power grid and telecommunications networks.
Related
The Obama administration had carefully avoided naming a specific culprit. Now it has. In the Pentagon’s annual report to Congress on China, the Chinese government and, in particular, the Chinese military are explicitly accused of mounting attacks on United States government computer systems and defense contractors in a systematic effort to steal intellectual property and gain strategic advantage.

The report adds urgency to talks expected to begin in July with the Chinese about cyberissues. It does not discuss America’s own considerable investment in disruptive computer capabilities. These, too, must be on the agenda.

China’s ambitions have been discussed on a background basis by senior officials and were the subject of an earlier report by the computer security firm Mandiant that was disclosed by The Times in February. The new report to Congress adds depth and detail. Its clear purpose is to increase pressure on China to rein in its hackers, who Mandiant has said, are largely run by Chinese Army officers or are contractors working for military commands.

But for anyone broadly interested in the possibility of a global disruption caused by government-directed hackers, the report suffers from one conspicuous omission: It does not address America’s own role in the expanding world of cyberwarfare nor that of other countries with active programs, like Russia, Britain and Israel. The report said that the primary goal of China’s cyberattacks on the United States was to steal industrial technology but that many intrusions were designed to obtain insights into American policy makers’ thinking. The report also warned that information gathered on American defense networks, logistics and military capabilities could be exploited during a crisis.

The United States has spent billions of dollars defending its computer networks, as it should. But, increasingly, it is also investing billions more in offensive capabilities, including malware that can disrupt an adversary’s networks like the American-Israel Stuxnet virus did to Iran’s nuclear program in 2010. Cyber is one of the few growth areas in the military budget; Congress and the Obama administration will need to take care that the Pentagon is not exploiting the China threat to boost the budget even more to make up for other reductions.

One positive development is that China, after considerable resistance, now seems willing to discuss cyberissues with the United States. The Americans seem intent on keeping the focus on persuading Chinese officials to end attacks on commercial and economic interests and to understand that, if they don’t, it would damage relations with the United States. It would be a mistake not to also engage China, and other countries as well, on military-related issues, including what constitutes cyberaggression and how governments should respond. The world does not need a cyber arms race.

HONG KONG — China’s Ministry of Foreign Affairs on Tuesday criticized a Pentagon report that explicitly accused China’s military of staging attacks on the computer systems of the American government and military contractors.

“China has repeatedly said that we resolutely oppose all forms of hacker attacks,” said a ministry spokeswoman, Hua Chunying. “We’re willing to carry out an even-tempered and constructive dialogue with the U.S. on the issue of Internet security. But we are firmly opposed to any groundless accusations and speculations, since they will only damage the cooperation efforts and atmosphere between the two sides to strengthen dialogue and cooperation.”

In its annual report to Congress on Chinese military capabilities, which was released on Monday, the Pentagon said that last year, “numerous computer systems around the world, including those owned by the U.S. government, continued to be targeted for intrusions, some of which appear to be attributable directly to the Chinese government and military.”

In a telephone interview, a retired People’s Liberation Army major general, Xu Guangyu, who is now a senior consultant at the China Arms Control and Disarmament Association in Beijing, voiced sentiments similar to that of Ms. Hua. He said that China was the victim, not perpetrator, of Internet hacking.

“From the president down, people in the United States have leveled accusations, and China has already many times answered those accusations,” General Xu said. “Everyone knows that on the Internet, the United States wields absolute advantage and control.”

He called for the United States to take the lead on international talks to set rules on cyberespionage. “It should be the United States that sets an example of sitting down for discussions on an equal footing, and setting better rules to reduce the damage, because it’s the United States that has absolute dominance,” he said.

Chris Buckley contributed reporting from Hong Kong, and Patrick Zuo contributed research from Beijing.

HONG KONG — The state-controlled Bank of China said on Tuesday that it had ended all dealings with a key North Korean bank in what appeared to be the strongest public Chinese response yet to North Korea’s willingness to brush aside warnings from Beijing and push ahead with its nuclear and ballistic missile programs.

Chinese analysts said the Bank of China’s move carried clear diplomatic significance at a time when the Obama administration has been urging China to limit its longtime support for the North Korean government. The Bank of China’s action also dovetails with a longstanding American effort to target the North Korean government’s access to foreign currency. Most countries’ banks already refuse to have any financial dealings with North Korea, making the Bank of China’s role particularly important.

“I personally don’t believe that this would have been a business decision by the bank alone, and it’s probably a signal from the government to reflect its views on North Korea,” said Cai Jian, a professor and the deputy director of the Center for Korean Studies at Fudan University in Shanghai.

“This appears to be a step by the government to show that it’s willing to cooperate with the international community in strengthening sanctions or perhaps taking steps against illicit North Korean financial transactions,” he said.

Ruan Zongze, a former Chinese diplomat in Washington who is now a vice president of the China Institute of International Studies in Beijing, said the Chinese government was responding to a recent United Nations resolution imposing further sanctions on North Korea after its nuclear and ballistic missile tests and was not responding to American pressure. He noted that the Chinese government had recently encouraged state-controlled enterprises to follow the resolution in their dealings with North Korea.

“This is, I think, one of the concrete actions taken by China, that we will surely follow what the U.N. requires,” he said in a telephone interview.

In another sign of international pressure on North Korea, the United Nations announced Tuesday that it had appointed a prominent Australian jurist to lead a panel tasked with investigating human rights abuses and possible crimes against humanity in North Korea “with a view to ensuring full accountability.”

Michael Kirby, a former Australian high court judge and legal reformer, will lead the human rights panel, a Commission of Inquiry, the United Nations Human Rights Council said in a statement released in Geneva. Its other members will be a Serbian human rights campaigner, Sonja Biserko, and Marzuki Darusman, who is already serving as a United Nations investigator monitoring North Korea.

Key issues for the panel include North Korea’s network of political prison camps, believed by human rights organizations to hold up to 200,000 people; the state’s manipulation of access to food as a tool of political repression; and enforced disappearances, including abductions of Japanese. All such abuses may constitute crimes against humanity, Mr. Darusman said in a report to the Human Rights Council in March.

In a single-sentence statement on Tuesday afternoon, the Bank of China said it has “already issued a bank account closing notice to North Korea’s Foreign Trade Bank, and has ceased accepting funds transfer business related to this bank account.”

A spokeswoman for the bank declined to say whether money in the account would be frozen or returned to North Korea. The spokeswoman, who insisted that her name not be used in keeping with bank policy, said the account had been closed by the end of April.

The Bank of China was the overseas banking arm of China’s central bank until the 1980s and is still majority-owned by the Chinese government, playing an important role in diplomatic and financial policy.

A succession of United States administrations has pressed China for many years to rein in the nuclear program of North Korea, a client state that China has long supported financially and diplomatically as a bulwark against South Korea and the American military forces based there. China has been reluctant until now to join international sanctions against North Korea, but there have been growing signs of dissatisfaction among Chinese intellectuals and possibly Chinese officials about the extent to which the North has shrugged off warnings and pushed ahead with tests in recent months of nuclear weapons and long-range missiles.

The United States Treasury imposed sanctions in March on the North Korean Foreign Trade Bank after accusing it of involvement in nuclear proliferation. Tom Donilon, the White House national security adviser, called at the time for China to stop conducting “business as usual” with North Korea.

Mr. Cai said that the move by the Bank of China appeared to be “predominantly symbolic,” but later added, “It could have practical consequences, because North Korea is already under such heavy international sanctions, and China is such an important economic channel for it.

“If China narrows the door to North Korea, then its economic operations or financial flows could be affected,” he said. “But primarily this appears to be a way of China showing its views about their behavior, so that North Korea is more likely to rethink its actions.”

The United Nations commission intends to document abuses as a way of pressuring North Korea’s leaders to improve conditions for the country’s 24 million people. Officials have few expectations that the North will grant access to the commission members, but Mr. Darusman said in March that an international inquiry “affords a measure of protection, especially when coupled with the prospect of future criminal investigations and the deterrent effect such a prospect may have on individual perpetrators.”
HONG KONG — Trade figures for April released by the Chinese government on Wednesday morning were slightly better than economists expected, but still indicated that demand was fairly weak in foreign markets and in China itself.

Exports and imports both increased last month compared with a year earlier, but the figures were harder than usual to interpret because April of last year was so weak. Imports and exports all but stopped growing in April of last year as a wide range of industries, perceiving a short, sharp domestic economic slowdown that would last until early autumn, stopped buying industrial commodities, even as foreign buyers cut orders as well.

Compared with that weak base, China’s trade figures for last month looked somewhat better. Exports rose 14.7 percent from a year ago, while imports increased 16.8 percent.

But the trade figures were far from strong enough to suggest that foreign demand could pull China out of what seems to be a deepening economic malaise. Although official figures still show the economy steaming along at a growth rate of nearly 8 percent, a range of purchasing manager surveys last month showed growing worry among business executives across China.

“China is in a very difficult position now,” as American and European consumers seem wary of further increases in the coming months in their purchases of Chinese goods, said Diana Choyleva, an economist in the Hong Kong office of Lombard Street Research, an economic analysis firm.

The discouraging shift in sentiment, after a fairly weak economic performance in March as well, comes despite enormous lending through the autumn, winter and early spring. China’s leaders were able to turn the sharp economic slowdown a year around by flooding the economy with bank and trust loans, and other credit.

But the heavy lending has brought about considerably less economic growth than earlier rounds of monetary easing, raising worries that China’s investment-dominated economy is running out of economically viable projects to pursue and may not be able to shift quickly enough to consumer-led growth.

China has scheduled the release of April inflation data on Thursday, and a wide range of April economic statistics next Monday, including including industrial production, fixed asset investment and retail sales.

Another uncertainty about Wednesday’s trade data lies in whether the export figures are even accurate, or whether they have been artificially inflated. A gradual rise in the value of the renminbi against the dollar over the last year, together with expectations that this rise will continue, has created an incentive for exporters to overstate the value of the goods they ship out of the country, as a way to bypass China’s currency controls and bring more dollars into the country to convert into renminbi.

The Chinese government has opened an investigation into whether exporters are overinvoicing clients, after export data in the first quarter showed unusual patterns, including a surge in reported Chinese exports to Hong Kong that did not match Hong Kong data.

Louis Kuijs, an economist in the Hong Kong office of the Royal Bank of Scotland, estimated that overinvoicing of exports accounted for more than half of the year-on-year growth in China’s exports last month. By adjusting for this, he said that the true growth in China’s exports last month appeared to be more like 5.7 percent than 14.7 percent.

 There has been little sign of manipulation of import figures, which appear to show that domestic demand is holding up a little better than overseas demand.

LONDON — After 13 years and a nearly complete transformation, Diageo, the world’s biggest distiller, said Tuesday that there would be change at the top.

Diageo, which is based in London and whose products include Smirnoff vodka and Johnnie Walker Scotch, said its chief operating officer, Ivan M. Menezes, would succeed Paul S. Walsh as chief executive in July. Mr. Walsh, who is credited with turning Diageo into a global company, would stay on for a year before retiring at the end of June 2014.

Under Mr. Walsh, 58, Diageo expanded in faster-growing markets like China to offset dwindling sales in Europe. The company’s share price climbed as its acquisitions won it market share and as he invested in marketing and sales in Asia, Africa and Latin America.

Franz B. Humer, chairman of Diageo, said, “The handover is being made at a time when the business is strong and Ivan takes on the role of chief executive officer at an exciting stage of the company’s global development.”

Mr. Menezes, 53, is expected to continue with Mr. Walsh’s plan to increase growth in markets like Africa, Asia and Turkey, so that the area makes up 50 percent of sales. Sales from those markets now comprise 42 percent of sales.

Mr. Menezes, who was born in India, was directly involved in Diageo’s acquisition of the Brazilian brand Ypioca last year. He also worked with Mr. Walsh on the difficult negotiations to buy a part of Vijay Mallya’s United Spirits in India, the world’s largest whiskey market. Mr. Menezes was widely expected to take over from Mr. Walsh when he was promoted to chief operating officer last year.

“This is a very exciting time of great opportunity for our company,” Mr. Menezes said in a statement. “I look forward to building on the fundamental strengths of our business.”

Diageo generates the largest part of its sales, about a third, in North America, where it recently benefited by raising its prices and increasing its marketing spending. Yet the fastest growing market for the company is South America, where sales increased 18 percent over the last six months of 2012.

After steady growth in earnings, companies like Diageo have begun to be affected by the economic downturn and austerity in Europe, which has constrained consumer spending. Mr. Menezes’s biggest challenge, according to some analysts, will be to ensure that Diageo can continue to win market share in economies where consumer appetite is growing despite growing competition.

“His job number one will be not to allow the foot to come off the pedal of organic growth,” said Martin Deboo, an analyst at Investec. “Then he has to decide what the next chapter of the strategy will be and how best to evolve the portfolio.”

Mr. Menezes arrived at Diageo as the result of a merger. While strategy director at Guinness in 1997, it merged with Grand Metropolitan Public, a British food and beverage company, in the same year to create Diageo.

Mr. Menezes helped to integrate the two businesses and was later named president of Diageo North America. Before Diageo, Mr. Menezes worked in sales, marketing and strategy roles for the consulting firm Booz Allen in the United States and Nestlé in Asia.

In a statement, Mr. Walsh said Mr. Menezes played a pivotal role in making Diageo one of the world’s largest alcoholic-drink companies, which “demonstrates that he is the right person to lead Diageo on the next stage of its journey.”

HONG KONG — Chinese consumers shop online, using gadgets like smartphones and tablets, more frequently than their counterparts elsewhere, according to a report released Tuesday by the consulting firm PwC.
The findings, which are based on a survey of more than 11,000 online shoppers in 11 countries, underline the speed at which China has emerged as one of the world’s most wired retail markets.

Online shopping, nearly nonexistent in China as recently as five years ago, has emerged as a major sales channel for retailers, with combined sales of about 1.3 trillion renminbi, or $211 billion, last year, said Carrie Yu, China and Asia Pacific retail and consumer expert at PwC in Hong Kong.

“Things are happening very fast here,” Ms. Yu said. “E-tailing has become a major focus for C.E.O.’s across all segments of retailing, whether it’s electrical goods, luxury goods or even groceries.”

The explosive growth of electronic shopping in China has led to the country’s emergence as one of the world’s busiest online shopping markets, both in terms of overall sales volumes and in terms of the frequency with which consumers shop online, Ms. Yu said.

In China, 58 percent of respondents in the PwC report said they shopped online at least once a week, for example. That percentage was by far the highest of any of the countries covered in the PwC survey. By comparison, only 42 percent of U.S. respondents, 41 percent of those in Britain, and 29 percent of German respondents said they shopped online at least once a week. The percentage was lowest in France, where only 13 percent said they made online purchases once or more a week.

Chinese consumers are also significantly more likely than their counterparts in other parts of the world to use smartphones or tablets, rather than PCs, to make online purchases. More than one third of Chinese online shoppers used such devices, about double the global average, the PwC report found.

The quest for lower prices has been a main driver of online shopping around the world in recent years, especially in the half-decade since the global financial crisis, when consumers in many parts of the world became more eager to save money, Ms. Yu said.

In China, however, the growth of online shopping has been given several extra kicks.

The economy has continued to grow rapidly; wages have risen; and the country’s online population has ballooned along with better communications networks and the easy availability of online devices.

“In a nation where many other sectors are rapidly expanding, e-tailing stands out for its astonishing growth,” McKinsey wrote in a report published in March.

According to McKinsey, China was the world’s second-largest e-tailing market, after the United States, in 2011, with sales totaling $120 billion — well above the $107 billion in Japan, and more than twice those recorded in Britain, for example. By 2012, China came “very close to equaling the United States for the top spot” in terms of e-tailing volumes, McKinsey added.
WASHINGTON — President Obama offered an endorsement Tuesday of South Korea’s new president, Park Geun-hye, and her blueprint for defusing tensions with North Korea, but warned that the first move was up to the erratic, often belligerent young leader in Pyongyang, Kim Jong-un.

n a news conference after an Oval Office meeting, Mr. Obama said Ms. Park’s policy, which mixes deterrence with an openness to engagement, is “very compatible with my approach.”

But after weeks of warlike statements from Mr. Kim, which subsided only in recent days, Mr. Obama emphasized that the “burden is on Pyongyang to take meaningful steps to abide by its commitments and obligations, particularly the denuclearization of the Korean Peninsula.”

It was the first meeting for Mr. Obama and Ms. Park, a steely conservative who is the first female leader of South Korea and the daughter of an assassinated South Korean strongman, Park Chung-Hee. And it came after a tempestuous few weeks, in which North Korea threatened to rain nuclear missiles on both South Korea and the United States.

“If Pyongyang thought its recent threats would drive a wedge between South Korea and the United States, or somehow garner the North international respect, today is further evidence that North Korea has failed again,” Mr. Obama said. “President Park and South Koreans have stood firm, with confidence and resolve.”

Yet behind the display of unity, some analysts questioned whether Ms. Park’s emphasis on engagement, as well as deterrence, could end up at odds with Mr. Obama’s more hands-off approach with the North Koreans.

Much of their meeting, a senior administration official said, was devoted to Ms. Park, 61, explaining her strategy — called “trust-politik” — which aims to rebuild trust between the North and South by looking for ways to engage, even while responding strongly to acts of provocation.

The Obama administration has eschewed direct contact with North Korea and has made negotiations contingent on getting a commitment from the North to abandon its nuclear weapons. Whether Ms. Park believes that must be a precondition is not clear. She appears to be open to initial talks while turning to denuclearization later.

“If there is no nuclear component to it, or a security component, than I doubt if the North Koreans are going to be responsive,” said Joel Wit, a former State Department negotiator on North Korea. “Without active U.S. participation on the security issues, it’s not going to get very far.”

The administration official played down those fears, noting that in her meeting with Mr. Obama and in the news conference, Ms. Park declared that the “ultimate objective that all of us should be adopting is for North Korea to abandon its nuclear weapons.”

There were other modest tensions just beneath the surface, involving how far to allow South Korea to go in developing its own nuclear fuel cycle. That issue surrounded the renewal of a civilian nuclear accord with South Korea — a major issue in Seoul, because it prohibits the South from enriching or reprocessing its own nuclear fuel.

That restriction is considered critical by the United States because it keeps the South from gaining the technology it would need to build its own nuclear weapon, something it tried to do decades ago, before the effort was detected and stopped by the Central Intelligence Agency.

Before Mrs. Park’s arrival, the White House and the South Koreans agreed to extend the current accord, and the prohibition, for two years. But Mr. Obama remains concerned that if the United States permitted South Korea to produce nuclear fuel, it would be impossible to persuade North Korea to “denuclearize” the Korean Peninsula, under a two-decade-old agreement between North and South.

“We didn’t want this to be a cliffhanger visit,” said the senior official, when asked why the accord was extended while negotiations on a new one continued. “No one wanted to make a mad dash to an accord.”

The meeting came as tensions on the Korean Peninsula seemed to ebb, at least for now. The North appeared to roll back two Musadan missiles from their coastal launching sites. But analysts said they believed the reduction in tensions was a pause, not a long-term trend.
“I think the lull is mostly about tone, and the trajectory hasn’t changed at all,” said Michael J. Green, a Korea expert at the Center for Strategic and International Studies in Washington. “There may a Musadan launch soon; they are chugging ahead.”
In a development greeted with cautious optimism by American officials, the state-controlled Bank of China said Tuesday that it had ended all dealings with a key North Korean bank — the strongest public response by China yet to North Korea’s behavior. In a statement, the United States Treasury said, “We welcome these steps to protect the financial system from illicit North Korean activity.”

China analysts said the move carried clear diplomatic significance at a time when the Obama administration has been urging China to limit its longtime support for the North Korean government.

The Bank of China’s action also dovetails with a longstanding American effort to target the North Korean government’s access to foreign currency. Most countries’ banks already refuse to have any financial dealings with North Korea, making the Bank of China’s role particularly important.

“I personally don’t believe that this would have been a business decision by the bank alone, and it’s probably a signal from the government to reflect its views on North Korea,” said Cai Jian, the deputy director of the Center for Korean Studies at Fudan University in Shanghai.

“This appears to be a step by the government to show that it’s willing to cooperate with the international community in strengthening sanctions or perhaps taking steps against illicit North Korean financial transactions,” he said.

At the White House, Ms. Park stressed China’s leverage over North Korea, saying, “China’s role, China’s influence can be extensive, so China’s taking part in these endeavors is important.”

In another sign of international pressure on North Korea, the United Nations announced Tuesday that it had appointed a retired Australian judge, Michael Kirby, to lead a panel charged with investigating human rights abuses and possible crimes against humanity in North Korea “with a view to ensuring full accountability.”

WASHINGTON — The Obama administration, resolving years of internal debate, is on the verge of backing a Federal Bureau of Investigation plan for a sweeping overhaul of surveillance laws that would make it easier to wiretap people who communicate using the Internet rather than by traditional phone services, according to officials familiar with the deliberations.

The F.B.I. director, Robert S. Mueller III, has argued that the bureau’s ability to carry out court-approved eavesdropping on suspects is “going dark” as communications technology evolves, and since 2010 has pushed for a legal mandate requiring companies like Facebook and Google to build into their instant-messaging and other such systems a capacity to comply with wiretap orders. That proposal, however, bogged down amid concerns by other agencies, like the Commerce Department, about quashing Silicon Valley innovation.

While the F.B.I.’s original proposal would have required Internet communications services to each build in a wiretapping capacity, the revised one, which must now be reviewed by the White House, focuses on fining companies that do not comply with wiretap orders. The difference, officials say, means that start-ups with a small number of users would have fewer worries about wiretapping issues unless the companies became popular enough to come to the Justice Department’s attention.

Still, the plan is likely to set off a debate over the future of the Internet if the White House submits it to Congress, according to lawyers for technology companies and advocates of Internet privacy and freedom.

“I think the F.B.I.’s proposal would render Internet communications less secure and more vulnerable to hackers and identity thieves,” said Gregory T. Nojeim of the Center for Democracy and Technology. “It would also mean that innovators who want to avoid new and expensive mandates will take their innovations abroad and develop them there, where there aren’t the same mandates.”

Andrew Weissmann, the general counsel of the F.B.I., said in a statement that the proposal was aimed only at preserving law enforcement officials’ longstanding ability to investigate suspected criminals, spies and terrorists subject to a court’s permission.

“This doesn’t create any new legal surveillance authority,” he said. “This always requires a court order. None of the ‘going dark’ solutions would do anything except update the law given means of modern communications.”

A central element of the F.B.I.’s 2010 proposal was to expand the Communications Assistance for Law Enforcement Act — a 1994 law that already requires phone and network carriers to build interception capabilities into their systems — so that it would also cover Internet-based services that allow people to converse. But the bureau has now largely moved away from that one-size-fits-all mandate.

Instead, the new proposal focuses on strengthening wiretap orders issued by judges. Currently, such orders instruct recipients to provide technical assistance to law enforcement agencies, leaving wiggle room for companies to say they tried but could not make the technology work. Under the new proposal, providers could be ordered to comply, and judges could impose fines if they did not. The shift in thinking toward the judicial fines was first reported by The Washington Post, and additional details were described to The New York Times by several officials who spoke on the condition of anonymity.

Under the proposal, officials said, for a company to be eligible for the strictest deadlines and fines — starting at $25,000 a day — it must first have been put on notice that it needed surveillance capabilities, triggering a 30-day period to consult with the government on any technical problems.

Such notice could be the receipt of its first wiretap order or a warning from the attorney general that it might receive a surveillance request in the future, officials said, arguing that most small start-ups would never receive either.

Michael Sussmann, a former Justice Department lawyer who advises communications providers, said that aspect of the plan appeared to be modeled on a British law, the Regulation of Investigatory Powers Act of 2000.

Foreign-based communications services that do business in the United States would be subject to the same procedures, and would be required to have a point of contact on domestic soil who could be served with a wiretap order, officials said.

Albert Gidari Jr., who represents technology companies on law enforcement matters, criticized that proposed procedure. He argued that if the United States started imposing fines on foreign Internet firms, it would encourage other countries, some of which may be looking for political dissidents, to penalize American companies if they refused to turn over users’ information.

“We’ll look a lot more like China than America after this,” Mr. Gidari said.

The expanded fines would also apply to phone and network carriers, like Verizon and AT&T, which are separately subject to the 1994 wiretapping capacity law. The FBI has argued that such companies sometimes roll out system upgrades without making sure that their wiretap capabilities will keep working.

The 1994 law would be expanded to cover peer-to-peer voice-over-Internet protocol, or VoIP — calls between computers that do not connect to the regular phone network. Such services typically do not route data packets through any central hub, making them difficult to intercept.

The F.B.I. has abandoned a component of its original proposal that would have required companies that facilitate the encryption of users’ messages to always have a key to unscramble them if presented with a court order. Critics had charged that such a law would create back doors for hackers. The current proposal would allow services that fully encrypt messages between users to keep operating, officials said.

In November 2010, Mr. Mueller toured Silicon Valley and briefed executives on the proposal as it then existed, urging them not to lobby against it, but the firms have adopted a cautious stance. In February 2011, the F.B.I.’s top lawyer at the time testified about the “going dark” problem at a House hearing, emphasizing that there was no administration proposal yet. Still, several top lawmakers at the hearing expressed skepticism, raising fears about innovation and security.



An earlier version of this article misspelled the surname of a former Justice Department lawyer who advises communications providers and commented on one aspect of the F.B.I.’s plan to overhaul surveillance laws. He is Michael Sussmann, not Sussman.

Stocks edged up on Wednesday, bolstered by financial and technology sectors, and were set to scale fresh highs as a rally continued for a fifth consecutive session.

In afternoon trading the Standard & Poor’s 500-stock index gained 0.3 percent, the Dow Jones industrial average rose 0.1 percent and the Nasdaq composite increased 0.4.

The S.&P. 500 financial sector index rose 0.5 percent with JPMorgan Chase, up 1.7 percent, among the top gainers on the Dow industrials.

Technology stocks also outperformed the broader market, providing lift for the Nasdaq index. Apple shares rose more than 1 percent after falling in the previous session.

Wall Street had started off lower as investors locked in profits after four days of gains which took equity indexes to new highs a day earlier. But the market rebounded in early morning trade as investors saw the dip as an opportunity to buy.

The Dow closed above 15,000 for the first time on Tuesday and the S.&P. ended at another record high. Both indexes hit new intraday highs during the session.

The tech sector was pushed higher by Apple, up 1.3 percent, and Google, up 1.7 percent.

Among bank stocks, Bank of America shares rose 2 percent and Citigroup was up 2.4 percent.

The S.&P. has climbed 2.7 percent over the past four sessions, and is up about 14 percent this year. Both the S.&P. and the Dow closed at new highs on Tuesday, with the Dow ending above 15,000 for the first time ever.

“While the U.S. equity market is widely believed to be tracking ahead of economic growth, broad market valuations are fair and not at extremes, implying still further upside,” said Terry Sandven, chief equity strategist at U.S. Bank Wealth Management.

Walt Disney Company reported earnings late Tuesday that beat expectations and revenue that was up 10 percent, while Whole Foods Market reported a rebound in same-store sales and raised its full-year profit view.

Shares of Disney slid 1.2 percent in early trading while Whole Foods advanced 10 percent

J.C. Penney reported another quarter of steep sales declines, though investors were cheered that the troubled department store posted cash levels that implied it had gone through less money than feared. The stock rose 8.5 percent.

Markets were also higher in Europe. The FTSEurofirst 300 index of the Continent’s 300 largest publicly held companies ended the day up 0.7 percent.

After last Friday’s upbeat jobs report in the United States and this week’s German industrial orders showing unexpected strength, China followed suit on Wednesday with better-than-expected trade numbers for April, further cementing the positive mood.

China’s exports and imports grew more than expected in April from a year earlier, possibly easing some of the concerns about weakness in the recovery of the world’s second-largest economy and top consumer of many commodities following a run of below-par data in recent weeks.

However, doubts remained over the strength of real demand in China and the accuracy of the figures.

Japanese stocks again outperformed their regional peers, scaling a fresh five-year high. The Nikkei stock average climbed as much as 1.7 percent to its highest since June 2008, before closing up 0.7 percent.

BEIJING — The sometimes-tense relationship between Hong Kong and Beijing appears set to move to another front: the world of art.

With the National Art Museum of China — or Namoc — planning to open in a new building in 2017, and Hong Kong projected to open its M+ museum in a new cultural district about the same time, the cities could emerge as twin titans of contemporary Chinese culture.

Namoc attracted some of the world’s leading architects, including Zaha Hadid, Frank Gehry and Jean Nouvel, to its design contest for the new museum in Olympic park in Beijing. Xie Xiaofan, a deputy director at Namoc, informally announced at the E.U.-China High Level Cultural Forum in November that Mr. Nouvel’s design had been selected, although the decision is subject to the approval of China’s new leadership.

The director of Namoc, Fan Di’an, said that the new building would house an ever-expanding collection of contemporary Chinese art. It will have 50,000 square meters, or almost 540,000 square feet, of exhibition space — six times the current space — with 20,000 square meters for the permanent collection and 30,000 square meters to showcase contemporary art, Republican-era art, and Western art.

State-run museums in Beijing have rarely been sanctuaries for experimental Chinese artists. But Mr. Fan said that many of Namoc’s new acquisitions would focus on art created after Mao Zedong’s death in 1976, which ushered in the end of the Cultural Revolution and, in many ways, the beginning of China’s rapid social transformation. Namoc’s collection, now dominated by Chinese scroll paintings and by artists with state backing, would also be expanded to include experimental “paintings, photographs, sculptures and new media art,” Mr. Fan said.

The original building would then be used to exhibit Namoc’s traditional Chinese paintings, said Fan Ling, an instructor at the Central Academy of Fine Arts in Beijing.

The updated collection will also highlight artworks produced in the period between the fall of China’s last emperor, in 1911, and the Communist Party’s seizing of power in 1949. A first wave of Chinese artists set off to study painting in France during this period, and some returned to establish what are now China’s leading art academies. Lin Fengmian, for example, who co-founded the prestigious China Academy of Art after studying in Paris, experimented with combining post-Impressionist techniques with Chinese ink painting until he was imprisoned during the Cultural Revolution.

But Namoc’s ambitious expansion plans are not without challenges. “Any museum would love to collect Lin Fengmian’s paintings,” said a young scholar at Namoc who spoke on the condition of anonymity, “but price levels for his works are extremely high at auctions.”

This is not an option for the state- owned museum. “The National Art Museum is a nonprofit, government-run institution, and is not permitted to purchase artworks at auctions,” Mr. Fan, the Namoc director, said in an interview.

Funds for acquisitions are provided by the Ministry of Culture, which also has the power to block the purchase of works by artists who are deemed by the Communist leadership to be troublemakers.

In the former British enclave of Hong Kong, the M+ museum has outlined its plans to showcase Chinese visual culture of the 20th and 21st centuries, along with works from elsewhere in Asia and the West, in the city’s West Kowloon Cultural District. Architectural firms led by Jacques Herzog and Pierre de Meuron, Toyo Ito, and Renzo Piano — all Pritzker Architecture Prize laureates — were recently named among the finalists in the competition to design M+.

In China’s new arts race, the Hong Kong institution has already taken a remarkable lead over Namoc: One of the world’s leading collectors of contemporary Chinese art, Uli Sigg, recently donated 1,400 works of art to M+.

“Uli’s collection of contemporary Chinese art is the most extensive anywhere in the world — the greatest one,” said Evelyn Lin, who led a Sotheby’s valuation of the donated works at 1.3 billion Hong Kong dollars.

The decision to donate to an institution outside mainland China was not taken lightly. “My first impulse was to give these artworks to a museum in Beijing or Shanghai,” Mr. Sigg, a former Swiss ambassador to China, said in an interview. But he said he was concerned that works by artists who are blacklisted in China’s state-run museums might never be exhibited in public. Before making a gift to one of these state citadels of culture, he said, he “wanted China to reveal its standards of censorship — what could be shown and couldn’t be shown in the collection.”

Because such details were not provided by the authorities, Mr. Sigg said, he opted for the M+ in Hong Kong. When Britain handed Hong Kong back to China in 1997, the two sides agreed that the territory would be governed under a “one country, two systems” model, and Hong Kong has retained a wide degree of freedom of expression, as well as a free press and independent courts.

Mr. Sigg began collecting experimental Chinese art after he helped set up one of Europe’s first industrial joint ventures, involving the Swiss company Schindler Group, with China in 1980. He then stepped up his acquisitions when he became the Swiss ambassador to China in the 1990s. While there, he said, he was disturbed to discover that some artists were banned from government-sponsored exchanges and visits, and that Chinese museums had imposed a de facto blockade on creators of political pop art. He began collecting paintings, sculptures and installations that he hoped would tell the story of China’s cultural evolution to future generations.

Mr. Sigg’s collection includes works by the artist Ai Weiwei, whose public criticism of the Chinese government led to his detention in isolation for almost three months in 2011. Mr. Ai is now free but is barred from leaving the country, and all exhibitions of his work inside mainland China have been canceled.

Mr. Sigg, who is a friend of the artist’s, said that if he had donated to a government museum in mainland China, it was “highly likely that Ai Weiwei’s works would not be exhibited.” Deeming this unacceptable, he took his collection beyond the reach of China’s cultural commissars.

The executive director of M+, Lars Nittve, predicted that other art patrons and philanthropists would, like Mr. Sigg, bypass museums in mainland China in favor of M+ because of Hong Kong’s “long tradition of freedom of expression.” He added, however, that M+ would seek to foster exchanges with museums on the mainland.

The importance of reaching out to mainland China was echoed by Mr. Sigg, who said he hoped Hong Kong’s free and independent art world would increasingly interact with and influence the mainland’s government-dominated system. “M+ could become an avant-garde model for all mainland Chinese museums,” he said.

Curators at the Hong Kong museum said that if Namoc were to begin exhibiting the works of China’s experimental — and often controversial — artists, it would represent a remarkable move toward cultural liberalization. In the past, many vanguard artists were treated like members of a cultural underground.

“Their works were considered a threat by the state museums,” explained Aric Chen, a curator for M+. “Some artist colonies were attacked; they had exhibitions that were shut down; and some artists were arrested.”

The expansion plans at Namoc will be closely watched. Mr. Sigg, who has been appointed to the M+ board of directors, said that he would urge the Hong Kong museum to extend long-term loans of artworks “if any mainland museum — including Namoc — would considerably soften up in terms of freedom of expression and exhibition.”

BEIJING — China’s most celebrated film director, Zhang Yimou, is being investigated for a potential violation of family planning laws, an official said Thursday, confirming reports in state news media.

Family planning officials are examining discussions on the Internet that say Mr. Zhang has fathered up to seven children with four women. If he is found to have violated the laws, he could be fined nearly $27 million because the fines are based on the offender’s income, according to a report in the online edition of People’s Daily, the official mouthpiece of the Communist Party.

An official in a propaganda office attached to the family planning committee of Jiangsu Province, near Shanghai on the east coast, confirmed the substance of the People’s Daily report, which was published Wednesday. Calls to the family planning committee of Wuxi, the city where Chen Ting, Mr. Zhang’s second wife, is registered as a resident, went unanswered on Thursday.

Family planning laws generally restrict families to one child, and fines are levied for additional children. There are numerous exceptions, though: Many rural families and ethnic minorities are allowed to have more than one child without penalty. Xinhua, the state news agency, said Thursday that the local family planning committee would release the results of its investigation into Mr. Zhang soon.

Mr. Zhang’s most recent feature film is “The Flowers of War,” starring Christian Bale; China entered it into the Oscar contest for best foreign film of 2011. Early in his career, Mr. Zhang made a string of films that became popular on the international film festival circuit and in foreign art theaters, including “Red Sorghum,” “Raise the Red Lantern” and “To Live,” adaptations of well-known literary works. He achieved commercial success with “Hero,” a martial arts film, and was commissioned by Communist Party leaders to direct the opening ceremony of the 2008 Olympics in Beijing.

Mr. Zhang, 61, is a member of the Chinese People’s Political Consultative Conference, a sort of honorary legislature whose seats are often distributed by the party as political rewards. His critics say he has changed over the years from a director with an uncompromising vision to one who bows to the whims of party officials.

In an interview with The New York Times published in 2012, Mr. Zhang said censorship “can’t be changed, and it will be there in the future.” He added: “Foreigners think that because I did the opening ceremony of the Olympics, I have certain privileges, but in fact it’s not like that at all. In front of censorship, everyone is equal.”

Mr. Zhang could not be reached for comment on Thursday.

Scholars have been pushing recently to end the one-child policy, which critics say has led to forced abortions and sterilizations. Some economists say that China will face a dwindling pool of young workers in the coming years, and that it no longer makes sense to continue the policy. Furthermore, for economic reasons, the birthrate is falling across China, especially in urban areas.

There is no reliable public report that gives the exact number of children Mr. Zhang has with Ms. Chen, an actress.

The recent surge of interest among Chinese Internet users in Mr. Zhang’s children appeared to have begun on Monday, when Southern Entertainment Weekly published an article that said the couple had two sons and a daughter. That assertion has not been independently confirmed and the article did not name the sources of the information.

The reporter and a photographer camped outside Mr. Zhang’s many homes in Beijing, and the photographer followed a car of his to the airport and witnessed what appeared to be family members emerging from the car, the article said.

Mr. Zhang has a daughter with his first wife, Xiao Hua, whom he divorced around the time he was in a relationship with Gong Li, who starred in Mr. Zhang’s early films and became China’s best-known actress. The daughter, Zhang Mo, is about 30 and studied filmmaking at New York University. She has worked as a film editor for her father and was a translator for Mr. Bale on the set of “The Flowers of War.”

The People’s Daily report said there was speculation that Mr. Zhang may have three other children with two other women, but it did not give their identities.

Sue-Lin Wong contributed research.

WASHINGTON — The House voted Thursday to allow the Treasury to continue to make payments to foreign and domestic federal creditors and Social Security recipients in the event of a stalemate over the government’s statutory borrowing limit, digging in for another debt ceiling standoff, which is looming in the fall.

The legislation, which passed 221 to 207, would allow limited borrowing to make payments to federal bondholders, then Social Security recipients, even if the Treasury is prohibited from borrowing to finance the rest of the government. No Democrats voted for it, and eight Republicans were opposed.

Republicans said the measure effectively took the threat of a government default off the table if the debt ceiling was breached. But opponents said the bill was unworkable and would do nothing to stave off a messy default and economic chaos once the Treasury exhausted its payment options early this fall. The bill is unlikely to get a hearing in the Senate, and President Obama has promised a veto.

Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, called it “so shallow” that it would fail an eighth-grade model government class.

House Republicans used the bill to signal that for the third time since taking control in 2011, they would try to extract major concessions on fiscal policy from the president before they were willing to raise the government’s borrowing authority.

“We’re not in any different position than we were two years ago,” Speaker John A. Boehner of Ohio told reporters Thursday. “We continue to spend more money than we bring in. You can’t continue to do this.”

The bill, called the “Pay China First Act” by Democratic opponents, signaled an end to a truce in Washington’s budget wars that ensued after Republicans and Democrats agreed in January to allow taxes to rise mainly on affluent households, then let $85 billion in across-the-board spending cuts take effect in March. Amid those steps, Congress temporarily set aside the government’s borrowing limit, but the statutory $16.4 trillion debt ceiling comes back into force May 19, at which time the government’s debt will actually already exceed that number.

Because of higher-than-expected tax receipts and large payments from the federally controlled housing agencies Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, Treasury officials believe they can shuffle money within accounts to avoid any more borrowing until the fall.

That schedule sets up what lawmakers in both parties see as another conflagration approaching on Sept. 30, when the government would run out of money to operate and the Treasury would near exhaustion of its borrowing options.

House and Senate appropriations committees have begun work on 12 annual spending bills, but House Republicans will set total spending in those bills at $967 billion, expecting the automatic spending cuts known as sequestration to continue. Senate Democrats are expected to use the spending cap of $1.058 trillion established in the first debt ceiling fight, in 2011. House Republican aides concede that a majority of House members might not be able to accept the cuts to domestic programs that would be needed to stay within the Republican limit.

The brewing standoff could be resolved with a comprehensive deficit reduction agreement, but so far House and Senate Republican leaders have refused to even convene a formal negotiating conference to resolve the vast differences between the budget blueprints passed by the Senate and the House.

“We should be talking about the budget in general and how we can get to conference and what we need to do to compromise,” said Senator Patty Murray, Democrat of Washington and the chairwoman of the Senate Budget Committee. “They’re over there debating how we’re going to create the next crisis that this country is going to have to face down.”

With little real negotiations going on, Democrats accused House Republicans of preparing for disaster. Representative Dan Maffei, Democrat of New York, said the House “prioritization” bill “maps out not if but when the United States defaults for the first time in the nation’s history.”

Some Republicans were no more charitable.

Even if the Treasury could pull off the difficult task of managing incoming taxes and outgoing payments on a daily basis, about 25 percent of the government would have to shut down for lack of money. And Tony Fratto, a Treasury and White House spokesman in the Bush administration, said the task could not be done.

Daily tax receipts are “lumpy,” he said. They do not arrive in any steady or predictable way. At the same time, government payments are “spiky” and fluctuate in ways that do not mesh with income tax receipts. The bill also hands Democrats a talking point that Republicans are willing to make foreign creditors like China a priority over veterans and the military.

Mr. Fratto called the bill “technically impossible and politically disastrous.”

But Republicans said they were merely being prudent and signaling to world financial markets that they would not let the United States government miss debt payments.

“This legislation credibly and permanently removes the threat of default on a U.S. debt payment and ensures that Social Security benefit payments are paid in full and on time,” said Representative Dave Camp of Michigan, the chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee.

HONG KONG — The South Korean central bank surprised analysts on Thursday by trimming interest rates by a quarter of a percentage point — the latest central bank to cut rates in the face of tepid growth.

Australia, Europe and India have all lowered borrowing costs this month in a bid to oil the wheels of faltering economic activity.

The euro zone is still haunted by its festering debt crisis, while in Asia, the giant Chinese economy is in the midst of a major transition that entails slower growth driven more by domestic demand. In addition, economists have said the constant saber-rattling from North Korea may take a toll on sentiment.

In trimming rates to their lowest level since early 2011 — the cut took the base rate to 2.5 percent — the central bank in Seoul joined growth-bolstering efforts by the government, which on Tuesday signed off on plans for billions of dollars’ worth of additional stimulus spending to prime the economic pump.

The “sluggishness of economic activities in the euro area” has deepened, the Bank of Korea said in a statement accompanying its rate decision, while economic indicators in emerging-market countries like China “have been weaker than initially anticipated.”

For South Korea, the weakening of the currency in Japan, whose companies are major competitors to South Korean exporters in many areas, adds to the pain of an already tough trade environment. The yen has fallen sharply against major currencies, including the South Korean won, in the wake of efforts by the Japanese government and central bank this year to combat persistent deflation and reinvigorate growth.

“The rate cut will lower the funding cost of investment and may revive the prolonged slump of the property and construction sector,” Raymond Yeung, an economist at Australia & New Zealand Banking in Hong Kong, wrote in a research note.

“As the government is also pushing forward a supplementary budget and other fiscal stimulus packages, today’s cut will help accelerate recovery and increase the upside of Korea’s” gross domestic product, he added.

The central bank last cut rates in October 2012.

The two companies that make vaccines against cervical cancer announced Thursday that they would cut their prices to the world’s poorest countries below $5 per dose, eventually making it possible for millions of girls to be protected against a major cancer killer.

Thanks to Pap tests, fatal cervical cancers are almost unknown today in rich countries. But the disease kills an estimated 275,000 women a year in poor countries where Pap tests are impractical and the vaccine is far too expensive for the average woman to afford, so the price cut could lead to a significant advance in women’s health.

The World Health Organization, which has been pressing for faster progress in maternal health, greeted the news as “a great step forward for women and girls.”

When the new price was described, Dr. Paul D. Blumenthal, a professor of gynecology at the Stanford University School of Medicine who has pioneered cervical cancer prevention techniques in poor countries, said, “Mazel tov!” As long as there is enough affordable vaccine for the ever-growing populations of poor countries, he said, “this is good news for girls, women and their families.”

The lower prices — $4.50 for Merck’s Gardasil vaccine and $4.60 for GlaxoSmithKline’s Cervarix — were negotiated through the GAVI Alliance, which was created in 1999 with a grant from the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation to deliver more vaccines to the world’s poor.

The low price will initially apply to a few million doses for demonstration projects in Kenya, Ghana, Laos, Madagascar and elsewhere, but Dr. Seth Berkley, the alliance’s chief executive officer, said he hoped that by 2020, 30 million girls in 40 countries would get the vaccine at that price or less.

The vaccines must be kept refrigerated, and the three doses are normally given over six months — requirements that add to the difficulty of deploying them in poor countries.

The vaccines cost about $130 a dose in the United States, and each girl needs three doses. The lowest price that any other agency or government has negotiated, Dr. Berkley said, is the $13 paid by the Pan American Health Organization, which negotiates a bulk price for Latin American countries.

Since Latin America includes a mix of poor and middle-income countries, the manufacturers do not offer rock-bottom prices there, he said. The alliance subsidizes vaccine costs for the poorest countries in Africa, Asia and elsewhere, with the subsidies shrinking as the countries get richer.

The vaccines protect against the strains of human papillomavirus, or HPV, that cause 70 percent of cervical cancers. The Merck one also prevents genital warts, which are caused by related viral strains.

Gardasil and Cervarix, given to girls as young as 9, have caused controversy in the United States, where many parents fear side effects and worry that girls will see the vaccines as condoning sex at a young age. The vast majority of girls in the United States have not been inoculated.

In Australia, where the vaccines have been readily accepted, a recent study found a striking drop in cervical abnormalities, which are cancer precursors, among young women. In the five years after the vaccine was introduced there, cases of warts dropped by 93 percent among women and girls under age 21.

Despite the excitement among global health agencies, the charity Doctors Without Borders called the news “disappointing,” arguing that the prices should be even lower.

“Why are the pharmaceutical companies still making profits off the backs of the poorest countries?” asked Kate Elder, a vaccines policy specialist at the charity.

HPV vaccines were developed with taxpayer money, largely from the National Institutes of Health, she said, and Glaxo and Merck have already reaped billions in profits from theirs.

Measles vaccines, invented 50 years ago, cost as little as 25 cents to produce, and Ms. Elder said she believed HPV vaccines could be made for as little as $1 a dose. She acknowledged, however, that her only evidence of that was an unofficial estimate by Pan American Health Organization experts.

A spokeswoman for the organization declined to discuss its assessment of manufacturing costs because its own price negotiations are continuing.

Dr. Julie Gerberding, a former director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention who is president of Merck’s vaccine division, said $4.50 was Merck’s manufacturing cost, with no previous research, marketing or other costs built in.

“The price is what we calculate to be our cost of goods — we could be off by a few cents but not more,” she said. “As we expand volumes, the cost per unit can go down. Our intent is to sell it to GAVI at a price that does not bring profit to Merck.”

Glaxo declined on Wednesday to disclose its manufacturing costs, but noted that it had always been in first place on the Access to Medicines index, which was introduced in 2008 as a measure of how well pharmaceutical companies get their goods to the poor. A company representative said it would not make a profit on the vaccine at the new price.

Dr. Peter J. Hotez, president of the Sabin Vaccine Institute, said the vaccine should cost more to make than, for example, measles vaccine because it contains “viruslike particles” made through recombinant DNA technology rather than a virus simply grown in cells and then killed. Also, it protects against several HPV strains, while there is only one measles strain.

Dr. Berkley described the new prices as a ceiling, and said he expected them to go down as millions more doses were ordered and as rival vaccine makers from lower-cost countries like India and China entered the field. Other companies, including the Serum Institute of India, the world’s largest vaccine manufacturer, are developing papillomavirus vaccines, but at the moment only the Glaxo and Merck vaccines have approval from the World Health Organization.

The alliance, Dr. Berkley said, has already negotiated sharp price drops in the cost of pentavalent vaccine, a shot that protects against diphtheria, tetanus, whooping cough, hepatitis B and Haemophilus influenzae B.

That shot costs about $30 in wealthy countries and the alliance first started purchasing it at $3.50. “Now we’ve got it down to $1.19,” he said.

NEW DELHI — Another deadly incident struck Bangladesh’s export garment industry late on Wednesday night, when a fire swept through a factory, killing at least eight people, including top managers, according to news media reports.

The fire at the Tung Hai Sweater Factory in the Mirpur district of Dhaka, the capital, is again raising questions about the safety of garment factories in Bangladesh, which is now the world’s second-largest exporter of clothing after China. Bangladesh is still reeling from the collapse two weeks ago of the Rana Plaza complex, a disaster that so far has claimed at least 892 lives — most of them workers at five garment factories operating in the building.

For years, fire safety has been a problem in Bangladesh’s garment factories. Labor rights groups say several hundred garment workers have died in previous factory fires during the past decade. Last year, at least 112 people were killed in a fire at the Tazreen Fashions factory, which was making clothing for global retailers like Walmart and Sears.

The fire at the Tung Hai factory seems to be a much more contained occurrence. Bangladeshi news media reported that the factory was closed when the blaze erupted at 11 p.m. but that the company’s managing director and other executives were holding a late-night meeting with a top police official on an upper floor of the 11-story building.

The online news Web site bdnews24.com reported that the victims included the police deputy inspector general, Z. M. Monzur Morshed, as well as the factory’s managing director, Mahbubur Rahman. Mr. Rahman was also a director of the country’s most powerful industry trade group, the Bangladesh Garment Manufacturers and Exporters Association.

A factory security guard told bdnews24.com that repairs were under way on the factory’s electrical system when the fire broke out. According to the company’s Facebook page, the Tung Hai factory was filling orders for several European clothing brands and retailers.

HONG KONG — Brightly hued men’s underwear in a rainbow of colors is no longer selling well in Europe for the Zhongtian Garments Company in Xiamen, China. Exports are down 30 percent in the last year.

Children’s guitars with bodies resembling cats and cartoon characters are losing their charm for Yuesen Musical Instrument Factory in Huainan, China. And at the Yuzhongniao Outdoor Products Company in Jinjiang, domestic sales and exports alike are declining this year. The Canton Fair, China’s biggest export event, ended on Sunday with few new orders. “We are not even getting many people browsing this time,” said Alice Hong, Yuzhongniao’s sales manager.

After a powerful recovery through the autumn and winter from a V-shaped downturn last summer, China’s economy is unexpectedly faltering once again. Exports are weak. The country’s domestic economy is still growing mostly because of huge increases in lending by state-controlled banks and a surge in off-balance sheet lending. Consumer spending is rising, but not fast enough to offset weakness in other sectors.

That combination has prompted growing concerns among economists and business executives about the sustainability of even 7.5 percent growth in China in the coming years, the government’s current goal after three decades of double-digit growth with only a few interruptions.

The latest sign of trouble came on Wednesday, when China’s General Administration of Customs announced export and import figures for April. On the surface, they looked fairly respectable: exports were up 14.7 percent from a year earlier, and imports were up 16.8 percent.

But April 2012 was an exceptionally bad month for Chinese exports and imports — indeed, dismal trade statistics for that month were the first sign that economic weakness during the preceding winter was turning into a precipitous decline.

This April’s trade figures appeared even weaker when economists looked closer and found that the export growth had been largely propelled by growth in exports to Hong Kong, up 57 percent, and to special customs zones in China for export later, up even faster.

Since Hong Kong’s own data has not been showing large increases in imports from China so far this year, the Chinese government has already opened an investigation into whether exporters are overinvoicing for shipments. Overstating exports can allow companies to evade currency controls and move money into China to profit from the gradual appreciation of the renminbi against the dollar.

Louis Kuijs, an economist in the Hong Kong office of the Royal Bank of Scotland, estimated that with the exclusion of overinvoicing, export growth came to only 5.7 percent.

Over the last few years, economists have tended to pay less attention to China’s exports because they were declining as a share of the country’s total economic output, because of weak overseas demand. But newer research suggests that China may still be dependent on exports.

The reason is that multinationals have been rapidly localizing their purchases of various items like computer chips and auto parts in China instead of importing them from other Asian neighbors. So while total exports may not have been rising quickly in recent years in China, the Chinese content in each dollar of exports has been increasing.

Mr. Kuijs estimated that 20.7 percent of China’s economic output came from exports last year, a figure that had bottomed out in 2009 at 19.7 percent.

In a bad sign for exports in the months ahead, the Canton Fair announced this week that export orders placed at this year’s spring session had fallen 1.4 percent from a year ago. It was the latest sign that steeply rising blue-collar wages in China and a gradually appreciating currency are starting to erode the country’s international competitiveness; foreign investment in China has also begun to level off, while surging in lower-wage countries in the region, like Cambodia and Vietnam.

Li Yong, the general manager at Yuesen Musical, said that many Japanese, Taiwanese and Korean companies in his industry had recently moved to Indonesia as costs climbed in China.

What has kept the economy running is the huge volume of cash being pumped into it. Total social financing — a measure of all nongovernment borrowing from banks, bond markets, trusts and other sources — surged 58 percent in the first quarter of this year from the same period last year. Off-balance-sheet financing from the so-called shadow banking sector has been particularly active.

Local and regional governments have also been borrowing heavily, as have special financing units that many of them have set up. The central government is now trying to rein in this borrowing, said Terry Gao, an associate director of international public finance at Fitch. It downgraded China’s local currency debt on April 9 by a notch.

Borrowing — by a range of local, regional and national government agencies as well as many state-owned enterprises and some private businesses — is increasingly a concern. While total government and private sector credit in China as a share of economic output is still lower than the United States or Japan, it is rising steeply. It has already climbed to roughly 200 percent now from 120 percent in 2007.

The efficiency of heavy lending across the entire Chinese economy has plummeted, raising worries about the sustainability of Chinese credit-fueled growth. Through 2007, each dollar of additional credit set off an extra dollar of economic output. But now $3 to $4 of extra credit is extended before the same increase in output takes place, an indication that less economically viable roads, rail lines, business expansions and other investments are being financed.

China’s current economic model, with its swift buildup of debt to stave off a steeper decline in economic growth rates, “can probably go on for a while, certainly through this year and into 2014, but the potential financial stress in this is clearly going to rise,” said George Magnus, a senior economic adviser to UBS.

China is borrowing almost entirely in its own currency. It also has virtually no foreign debt and a high savings rate.

The country’s growing ranks of skeptics are unconvinced by these arguments. “You could have this same conversation about Japan in 1989,” Mr. Magnus said. “The fact Japan was a creditor country with a lot of savings did not stop a major bust from taking place.”

BEIJING — China took a modest step into Middle East diplomacy this week, hosting back-to-back visits from Mahmoud Abbas, the leader of the Palestinian Authority, and Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu of Israel.
But this was not exactly Camp David by the Forbidden City.

The fact that the visits were timed so the two leaders would not meet — Mr. Abbas left Beijing on Tuesday, and Mr. Netanyahu arrived Wednesday after a swing through Shanghai — signaled that neither they nor Xi Jinping, China’s leader, were ready for actual talks. But Mr. Xi did present a four-point peace proposal to Mr. Abbas, which, though it did not contain any breakthrough ideas, hinted that China had given some thought to playing a more energetic, if very limited, role as mediator in one of the world’s most protracted conflicts.

“As China’s economy, national strength and international status grow, Arab countries are looking more to China,” said Guo Xiangang, a vice president of the China Institute of International Studies in Beijing who follows China’s relations with Middle Eastern nations. “The expectations they place on China are growing.”

In their meeting on Wednesday afternoon, Prime Minister Li Keqiang of China told Mr. Netanyahu that “the Palestinian issue is a core issue affecting the peace and stability of the Middle East, and a peaceful solution reached through dialogue and negotiations is the only effective answer,” according to Xinhua, the state news agency.

“As a friend of both Israel and the Palestinians, China has always maintained an objective and fair stance, and is willing to strive together with all sides to actively advance the Middle East peace process,” Mr. Li said.

China has been careful to take a clear and consistent but not strong stand on the Israeli-Palestinian issue. China has growing trade ties with Israel — the value of their trade relationship has been estimated in official Chinese news reports to be nearly $10 billion a year — but it supports Palestinian statehood and relies on crude oil imports from Iran and Arab nations to meet its energy needs. About half of China’s oil imports come from the Middle East, and that dependency is expected to deepen.

The core of the four-point plan that Mr. Xi presented to Mr. Abbas was the establishment of a Palestinian state alongside Israel, based on the 1967 boundaries and with East Jerusalem as its capital. The plan was a formal version of China’s traditional stand on the conflict.

At the United Nations, where China sits on the Security Council, Mr. Abbas has pushed for greater status for the Palestinians, which has drawn economic reprisals from Israel and has led to a reduction in donations from foreign supporters. On Tuesday, the Chinese Foreign Ministry spokeswoman, Hua Chunying, said at a news conference that Israel had to halt the building of settlements in East Jerusalem and the West Bank, stop violence against innocent civilians and end the blockade against the Gaza Strip to clear the way for peace talks.

But China’s measured stand on the conflict was evident in some of Mr. Xi’s comments during his meeting with Mr. Abbas. “Israel’s right to exist and its reasonable security concerns should be fully respected,” Mr. Xi said, according to a report by Xinhua.

China’s position is also complicated by its strong support of Iran and various Arab nations. Iran, with its nuclear program, is one of the greatest security concerns for both Israel and the United States. China has sided with Russia to try to impede Western proposals for greater actions against Syria, which is a close ally of Iran and has been using bloody means to try to stamp out a rebellion.

Syria accused Israel of carrying out airstrikes last weekend on military targets outside Damascus. Ms. Hua, the Foreign Ministry spokeswoman, was asked at the news conference Tuesday whether Chinese leaders would raise the airstrikes with Mr. Netanyahu. “China and Israel are maintaining communication,” she said.

Despite the spotlight on the visits by Mr. Abbas and Mr. Netanyahu, China is likely to remain a muted political actor in the Middle East, analysts of the region said. Beijing sees little to gain from being entangled in distant and often seemingly intractable disputes, said Yin Gang, a professor of Middle Eastern studies at the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences in Beijing.

“China is a long way from the Middle East, and it can’t even reach a good solution to its own regional problems: North Korea, the Diaoyu Islands, the Philippines, Vietnam,” Mr. Yin said. “Even if China becomes a superpower with an economy on par with the United States’, it still won’t play a major role in the Middle East.”

China’s ideological flexibility on the Middle East and North Africa was evident during the recent Libyan revolution. China refused to support Western-led military support of the rebels fighting Col. Muammar el-Qaddafi, then intensified its relations with the rebels when it became obvious that Colonel Qaddafi’s government would fall.

Mr. Netanyahu’s talks with Chinese leaders are likely to be dominated by bilateral issues, including economic ties. The positions of both sides on Iran’s nuclear program and on the bloodshed in Syria are too clear and entrenched to expect any shifts from the talks, said Mr. Yin and Mr. Guo, the two scholars.

“Israel’s biggest concern is still Iran; it worries that Iran will develop nuclear weapons technology, and it’s looking for the international community to intensify economic sanctions and other pressure,” Mr. Guo said. “But China’s position is clear: it opposes military strikes against Iran and maintains that sanctions need to be measured.”

Mr. Netanyahu’s trip to China is the first by an Israeli leader since 2007. In Shanghai, he visited a memorial to refugees who fled to the city from the Holocaust in Europe. Xinhua reported that in his meeting Tuesday with Yang Xiong, the mayor of Shanghai, Mr. Netanyahu said: “Israel-China cooperation in the fields of science, technology and manufacturing can result in a perfect partnership. The difference between cooperating with China and other countries is that the effect can be more than tenfold, rather than just one- or twofold.”

Edward Wong reported from Beijing, and Chris Buckley from Hong Kong. Patrick Zuo and Sue-Lin Wong contributed research from Beijing.
n late 2010, Chinese customs officials imposed an import tax of 1,000 yuan (about $150 then) on every iPad brought into the country. Ignoring the fact that iPads differ in features and prices, officials set a single tariff: 20 percent of the tablet’s listed 5,000-yuan value. People who paid 3,000 yuan for an iPad in Hong Kong — where smartphones and other electronics are much cheaper than on the mainland — were charged the same tariff. Even Chinese tourists returning home with their own iPads, bought in China, were taxed!

This levy, imposed without prior warning, provoked a torrent of criticism. Even the Commerce Ministry registered disapproval, fearing that the levy would violate China’s commitments as a member of the World Trade Organization, which it joined in 2001.

As I set off for an overseas trip in January 2011, I asked the staff at the Beijing airport how to report that I would be leaving the country with an iPad, so as to avoid being taxed when I returned.

The first four people I asked said they didn’t know; the fifth told me the levy had been revoked. (In fact, the tax was cut in half, but not rescinded entirely.)

“Why hasn’t this change been publicized?” I asked.

“Why should it be?” he retorted. “When first implemented, it wasn’t publicized, either.”

If the central government’s decrees are opaque, local authorities’ can be downright ridiculous. In 2001, hospital officials in the southern city of Shenzhen specified that nurses should show precisely eight teeth when smiling. In 2003, Hunan Province, in central China, stipulated that the breasts of female candidates for civil-service positions should be symmetrical. The next year, public safety officials in the northern city of Harbin ruled that policemen whose waistlines exceeded 36 inches had to go. In 2006, transportation officials in Zhejiang Province, just south of Shanghai, banned employees from sporting facial hair. The following year, in an effort to reduce the school-dropout rate, Pinghe County in Fujian Province, on the southeast coast, decreed that a junior high school diploma was required to marry.

Several of these rules have since been revoked, but their wacky and arbitrary nature demonstrates the arrogance of power in China. One can imagine all too easily their creators — sitting in comfortable armchairs, drinking high-grade tea and smoking fine cigarettes — discussing the issues at hand as if they were purely intellectual abstractions, never considering how ordinary people might react. That people will be unhappy is no cause for concern because, for so long, the power of the state has trampled on individual rights. Only when rules are so onerous that they stir actual protest do higher-ups take notice: “You guys are just making a mess of things,” they’ll tell their bureaucrat underlings. “This is not good for social stability.” The rules are then quietly rescinded — sometimes.

Often, regulations are even inconsistent with national laws. Take, for example, revised driving regulations that went into effect on Jan. 1. To reduce the accident rate on Chinese highways, the Public Security Ministry came out with what have been called particularly harsh rules. The imposition of a six-point penalty for running a yellow light produced howls of protest. (In China, a 12-point penalty leads to revocation of a license.)

To many, the yellow-light rule seemed certain to cause an increase in rear-end collisions. Even the official media raised questions. “According to Clause 26 of China’s traffic safety law, signals consist of red, green and yellow lights,” the state-controlled Xinhua News Agency patiently explained. “The red light prohibits passage, the green light allows it, while the yellow light signifies warning. Each signal has a separate function, and now to nullify the distinction between yellow light and red light is not only unfeasible but also in conflict with current law.” The ministry backed down and downgraded the penalty to a warning.

During all the kerfuffle, a joke began to circulate:

A man fails to return home one wintry night. When he shows up the next morning, his wife demands an explanation.

“The traffic light at the corner kept blinking yellow,” he says, “and it didn’t go back to operating normally until just now. I would have been docked six points if I’d run the yellow light — or nine if I’d tried to make a U-turn at an intersection.”

“Why didn’t you at least call me?”

“You get docked three points if you use a phone while driving.”

The man is shivering uncontrollably. His wife asks: “How did you get this cold, just sitting in the car?”

“It was snowing so hard I had to keep clearing off the license plate — you’re docked a full 12 points if the number is obscured.”

Yu Hua, the author of “China in Ten Words,” is a guest columnist. This column was translated by Allan H. Barr from the Chinese.

McDonald’s said on Wednesday that sales at restaurants open more than a year slipped again in April, weighed down in part by declines in Asia, where the world’s biggest hamburger chain cited fears over a new strain of avian flu to explain weakness in China.

The company, which had warned of a decline last month, said same-store sales fell 0.6 percent globally. That reflected an increase of 0.7 percent in the United States, where it recently introduced its chicken McWraps.

But sales fell 2.4 percent in Europe, its biggest market by revenue. The company said it was seeking to improve results in the region by emphasizing “everyday affordability” and keeping stores open longer.

In the region encompassing Asia, the Middle East and Africa, sales were down 2.9 percent. The chain blamed the impact of the avian flu in China for the decline, as well as softness in Japan and Australia.

Yum Brands, which owns KFC and is China’s biggest Western fast-food company, has been hurt by the new strain of avian flu as well. It warned late last month that sales at established restaurants in China were down about 30 percent in April. Yum is also trying to recover from a controversy over its chicken suppliers that surfaced late last year.

After years of outperforming rivals, McDonald’s has been struggling to increase sales as it faces intensifying competition, changing eating habits and weak growth in the broader restaurant industry. Late last year, the company reported a decline in its monthly sales figure for the first time in nearly a decade. Soon after, the company ousted the head of its American division.

Sales at restaurants open at least 13 months is an important measurement because it strips out the impact of newly opened and closed locations.

McDonald’s, which has more than 34,000 locations around the world, noted that it had one fewer Sunday and one more Tuesday in April of this year compared with last April. The chain’s sales are generally stronger on weekends.

INTERPRETING any country’s pronouncements about its nuclear weapons can be a study in fine distinctions, but occasionally a state says — or fails to say — something in a clear break from the past. A Chinese white paper on defense, released on Tuesday, falls into this category and now demands our attention, because it omits a promise that China will never use nuclear weapons first. 
 That explicit pledge had been the cornerstone of Beijing’s stated nuclear policy for the last half-century. The white paper, however, introduces ambiguity. It endorses the use of nuclear weapons in response to a nuclear attack but does not rule out other uses.

With North Korea making overt nuclear threats, the job of deciphering Beijing’s cryptic and mild-sounding statement may not seem a priority. Indeed, it is because the likelihood of nuclear escalation with China is low that most defense experts are likely to focus instead on what the white paper has to say about China’s rapidly expanding conventional military capabilities.

But all of those developments may be closely connected.

In 1964, immediately after testing its first nuclear weapon, China promised to “never at any time or under any circumstances be the first to use nuclear weapons.” This “no-first-use pledge” was explicitly and unconditionally included in each of China’s defense white papers, from the first, in 1998, through the sixth and most recent, in 2011. It was among the strongest assurances in the world of no-first-use, a stance that the United States has never taken.

The change this year is almost certainly not the result of bureaucratic error. No-first-use has been such an intrinsic part of the Chinese nuclear liturgy that the authors of the white paper would have been extremely unlikely to have forgotten it. Besides, other evidence indicates that a broader rethinking of Chinese nuclear strategy may be under way.

Last December, shortly after being selected as general secretary of the Chinese Communist Party, Xi Jinping, who last month became China’s president, gave a speech to the Second Artillery Force, which is responsible for China’s land-based nuclear weapons. In the past, borrowing Mao Zedong’s imagery for China’s adversaries, Chinese officials have generally played down the value of nuclear weapons, describing them as “paper tigers.” But in a significant rhetorical shift, Mr. Xi is reported to have said that nuclear weapons create strategic support for the country’s status as a major power. In the speech, Mr. Xi did not repeat China’s no-first-use promise.

Taken together, the speech and the white paper are likely to create concern in the United States and among its allies, particularly Japan. Unquestionably, some of that concern will be stirred up by self-described “China hawks” who have been dismissing China’s no-first-use pledge as pure propaganda for the last five decades. Now, opportunistically, they may make a big issue of the apparent shift.

But theirs will not be the only voices expressing concern; indeed, even moderates are likely to agree. Only last month, the Center for Strategic and International Studies published a report by a bipartisan group of American analysts that said China’s no-first-use pledge was “broadly stabilizing and should be sustained.”

The white paper may also make it more difficult politically for President Obama to carry out his ambitious nuclear agenda, which includes creating the conditions that would allow the United States to declare that the sole purpose of its nuclear weapons is to deter their use by others.

The apparent shift in Beijing’s nuclear doctrine may well be a response to other security trends in the region. Even before the North Korean leader, Kim Jong-un, issued his latest round of nuclear threats, the Pentagon announced plans to reinforce its missile defenses in northeast Asia.

The United States has said that those defenses are meant to defend against North Korea, but they also appear to be intended to counterbalance Beijing’s growing arsenal of regional conventional missiles. Chinese defense planners worry that the United States may one day develop those defenses to the point at which they could neutralize China’s long-range nuclear forces as well, a fear exacerbated by American investments in conventional-strike capabilities.

So China may intend the new language in its white paper to send a signal: that in a future crisis, if it concluded that the United States was about to attack its nuclear arsenal with conventional weapons that were backed up by missile defenses, China might use its nuclear weapons first. The United States should recognize this concern; it was called “use ’em or lose ’em” during the cold war.

A candid, high-level dialogue regarding nuclear deterrence has been needed for some time. The new white paper and Mr. Xi’s speech have made the need urgent.

While the probability of nuclear escalation is low, the consequences would be catastrophic. The risk of nuclear use is already unacceptably high and, for that reason alone, mutual confidence-building is necessary. In addition, mutual suspicion in the nuclear domain spills over into the conventional domain, complicating efforts to reduce the chance of any kind of conflict.

Unfortunately, in spite of repeated invitations by the administrations of Presidents Obama and George W. Bush, China has not been willing to engage in a sustained conversation. The presidency of Xi Jinping may, however, present an opportunity. Given that Mr. Xi appears to have a personal interest in nuclear strategy, he may be willing to corral China’s military into engaging with the United States. His representatives should explain why China’s nuclear doctrine and posture are evolving. In the meantime, Beijing should avoid actually repudiating no-first-use to make it easier to reinstate the doctrine down the line.

For its part, Washington could make successful engagement more likely by offering to broaden such talks to include the full range of strategic military interactions between the two countries. Because the conventional arms competition in the western Pacific may be heightening Chinese concerns about the survivability of its nuclear forces, such a dialogue might appear more attractive to China than one narrowly focused on nuclear weapons.

No one can predict whether Mr. Xi will accept a renewed offer to talk. But it would be a win-win proposition.

James M. Acton is a senior associate at the Carnegie Endowment for International Peace.
YUXI, China — Many residents of this tiny village in the mountainous region of southwest China spent Saturday night in tents and makeshift shelters, too scared to sleep in their flimsy homes after an earthquake killed 188 people early that morning. 
 Roofs buckled, walls tumbled and windows broke after the earthquake shook houses and sent boulders tumbling down mountain sides onto the narrow road that leads into this valley of Lushan County near the epicenter of the earthquake, which Chinese authorities said had a preliminary magnitude of 7.

The aftermath was not nearly as serious as the 7.9-magnitude earthquake in 2008 that left more than 70,000 people dead in the Wenchuan area. But villagers who work in Chengdu, about 100 miles away, streamed back home Sunday morning, many on foot, the lucky ones on motorbikes, to check on their homes.

Song Yuanqing, 43, a construction worker, arrived back after a 22-hour trip to find his roof and the walls unstable. “We would like to do something, but we can’t do anything,” Mr. Song said as he sat with neighbors around an outdoor fire built by the village leader in his backyard. Some people had slept under the machinery at a lumber yard. The village leader, Gao Zaimeng, said his house — a two-story concrete structure that is one of the best in town — shook violently. “More violent than in 2008,” he said. Although his house was intact, he was too nervous to risk sleeping or cooking inside, he said.

About 50 soldiers attached to the People’s Liberation Army’s regional headquarters in Chengdu marched in formation along the main village street, armed with shovels and picks to help shore up buildings. In all, the government deployed about 7,000 soldiers and People’s Armed Police officers to the affected area. By Saturday evening, there were so many rescue workers in the area that the government asked volunteers to stop coming.

China’s prime minister, Li Keqiang, perhaps mindful of the criticism of the rescue efforts in 2008, flew to the area and slept in a tent on Saturday evening in Lushan County.

The earthquake shook Sichuan Province at 8 a.m., when people were rising a little later than usual because schools and universities were closed.

“We were just getting up and getting dressed in our dormitory when the building shook, and I looked outside from our seventh-floor window and saw a row of houses collapsed,” Xu Yan, 22, a student at the Agricultural University in Ya’an, said in a telephone interview. “I have never flown down the stairs so fast.”

The Chinese government said early Sunday that the known death toll was 174, with most of the victims in Ya’an. The ministry also said that about 5,700 people had been injured.

The United States Geological Survey said that the earthquake occurred on the Longmenshan fault line, the same one responsible for the 2008 quake. But more than 12 hours after the initial tremor, the impact seemed to be far less severe.

Chinese radio quoted an unnamed official who said, “We have a basic grasp of the overall disaster situation, and there won’t be thousands or tens of thousands of fatalities.”

Rescue efforts were hampered by landslides, and officials expressed concern about two barrier lakes that had formed after debris blocked two waterways.

The tremors were felt in Chengdu, one of China’s biggest cities and the capital of Sichuan Province. Residents described water spilling out of home aquariums and objects like home water dispensers falling to the floor.

Yang Yubing, an executive at a sculpture factory in Baoxing County, one of the hardest-hit areas, said he was visiting Chengdu when he felt the tremors. He immediately left on a seven-hour drive to his home in Baoxing. But emergency workers stopped him when he got close to his apartment, Mr. Yang said. “They said five or six kilometers of roads were collapsed,” he said in a telephone interview. “We are all living in temporary tents in the school.” Badly injured people were taken to hospitals by helicopter, he said.

In the town of Longmen, another hard-hit area within Ya’an’s jurisdiction, a resident, Zhang Yan, said 90 percent of the buildings had collapsed.

“About 100 people died around here,” Ms. Zhang said in a telephone interview. “Rescue crews have not yet arrived. There is no water or electricity.”

Xinhua quoted a hospital official who said scores of injured people were sprawled in front of the county hospital on Saturday afternoon. Firefighters in Lushan County pulled 27 survivors from collapsed buildings, Xinhua said.

The 2008 quake raised questions about poorly constructed schools that collapsed and killed thousands of students.

That earthquake prompted an extensive official relief effort and a passionate outpouring of volunteer help. But some quake-stricken residents and observers criticized the government for sending rescue efforts to the wrong places, or for failing to muster the equipment needed to lift victims from under slabs of concrete and brick. Instead, many troops and rescuers clambered over the rubble with sticks and spades.

This time, the government appears intent on avoiding any accusations of lagging behind

In 2008, officials restricted independent reporting on the disaster, but Ran Wang, a businessman, said he hoped officials would allow greater transparency. “No censorship, no cover-ups or control so the right of the people and society to be informed during natural disasters is respected,” he wrote on his microblog account.

The Longmenshan fault line, which runs between the Tibetan plateau and Sichuan Basin, is seismically active. Twelve earthquakes with a magnitude of 5 or greater have occurred along the fault line since 1900, said Jiang Haikun, an official with the China Earthquake Administration.

Sichuan Province is also one of China’s best-known habitats for pandas, and at the Bifengxia reserve, about six miles north of Ya’an, workers said that 20 pandas in the park were safe. “We inspected the panda area after the quake, and they were unaffected,” said Chen Yong, the media relations officer of the reserve.

Andrew Jacobs contributed reporting from Beijing, and Chris Buckley from Hong Kong. Patrick Zhou contributed research from Qionglai, and Bree Feng from Beijing.
ONG KONG — China said Monday that the United States’ decision to strengthen antimissile defenses in response to threats from North Korea risked deepening regional tensions, underscoring Beijing’s caution on further pressuring the North despite its third nuclear test.

 Earlier this month, China backed a United Nations Security Council resolution imposing banking, trade and travel sanctions on North Korea after it held the test on Feb. 12.

China’s warning was in response to Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel’s announcement on Friday that the Pentagon would spend $1 billion to put in place more ballistic missile interceptors to counter the growing reach of North Korea’s weapons.

The 14 new interceptors will be in Alaska, where 26 of the existing 30 are already deployed, and American officials said the decision was meant to show its allies South Korea and Japan that the United States would muster the resources needed to deter the North.

But a spokesman for the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Hong Lei, told reporters in Beijing that the decision risked adding to regional instability.

“Strengthening antimissile deployments and military alliances can only deepen antagonism and will be of no help to solving problems,” Mr. Hong said, in answer to a reporter’s question about Mr. Hagel’s announcement, according to a transcript on the Foreign Ministry’s Web site.

Mr. Hong did not name the United States, but was plain enough, saying, “China hopes that the country concerned will proceed from the standpoint of protecting regional peace and stability, demonstrate a responsible attitude and act carefully in regard to the antimissile issue.”

China has long served as North Korea’s most important diplomatic and economic supporter. It has opposed North Korean efforts to develop nuclear weapons, but has argued that harsh sanctions will not induce the North to abandon such ambitions.

China’s backing of the Security Council resolution, and open calls from prominent Chinese experts for their government to distance itself from North Korea, stirred speculation among some observers that China might move to reduce its political and economic support for the North.

But Chinese officials have been stressing that North Korea has its own security worries that should be dealt with, and that they do not see sanctions as the right tool to bring the North back to negotiations.

Mr. Hong’s comments appeared to reflect that view. China advocates “resolving missile proliferation issues through political means,” he said. 
BEIJING — “Gun shootings in America are unceasing, how is it qualified to talk about human rights?”

So ran the title of a furious, unsigned commentary today in Shanghai’s Eastday.com news portal, which accused the United States, in its annual human rights report on other countries issued last Friday, of “pointing fingers, blaming and denouncing other countries while showing itself off.”

China, which was criticized in the State Department report, hit back hard with its own report on human rights in America, issued Sunday, just two days after the U.S. report. The Chinese report was titled “The Human Rights Record of the United States in 2012″.

For years, the United States and China have engaged in a tit-for-tat of this kind — America criticizes, China responds, in an angry ritual of reports.

This year, the Chinese government focused on gun crime among several key issues, citing “astonishing casualties”; also on growing poverty in the United States and a wide wealth gap; and on America’s overseas wars, which it said had killed tens of thousands since 2011. It also singled out what it said was low voter participation in U.S. elections (57.5 percent in the 2012 presidential election, it said). “The U.S. citizens have never really enjoyed common and equal suffrage,” the report said, and criticized the detention of terrorism suspects in Guantánamo.

But it’s the issue of gun crime that perhaps has been most seized upon here. Eastday.com’s commentary, echoing the report, listed three recent mass shootings in the United States, in Oakland, Colorado and Connecticut, tallying the dozens who died. The United States was not protecting its citizens’ physical safety, it said: “Alone from this series of bloody shootings one can see the reality of America’s human rights.” In its report, the government noted that gun violence was a “serious threat to the lives and personal security of citizens in the U.S.”

It cited CNN from last July that there were an estimated 270 million guns in the hands of civilians in the U.S., with more than 100,000 people shot each year, it said. In 2010, there were more than 30,000 deaths caused by firearms, it said. “However, the U.S. government has done little in gun control,” it said.

Online, where ordinary Chinese people speak their minds relatively freely (and get censored, though much does evade the censor’s delete button — senior leaders are believed to follow microblogs closely to track public opinion), the comments were multiplying. Search for “America” and “human rights” on Sina Weibo, China’s biggest microblog site, and nearly 2.6 million entries pop up in total.

Yet many of those sampled were critical of China, not the United States, despite the fact that quite a few of the criticisms in China’s report are from reports that originated in the West — such as the tally of deaths overseas from America’s “war on terror” since 2001, gathered, the Chinese government said, from the Web site of the Stop the War Coalition.

Sarcasm was widespread, especially over the report’s criticism of low voter participation. (Chinese people cannot choose their government, though there are local elections where candidates are carefully vetted by the Communist Party.)

“I wonder what is the voter participation in this honorable country?” quipped Shui Shan X.

“Of these problems, except for the first,” the shootings, “which of them has not happened in China, and more seriously than in other places?” wrote Chenmo de mouzi.

In a post addressed to the State Council, which issued the report, Merlin_MaWT seemed to warn the government that Chinese people cannot be fooled any longer. “Do you think that we people today are really the people of 30 years ago? Do you really think that information today is the same as 30 years ago when there was only your media?” the person wrote.

And referring to the criticism of U.S. elections, Zhaini Ruocao wrote, simply: “Chinese-style humor.”

BEIJING — One of France’s wealthiest businessmen has agreed to return to China two bronze animal heads that were looted from the imperial Summer Palace near Beijing by invading French and British troops in the 19th century, according to a report on Friday by China Radio International, a state news organization. To China, the looting of the palace epitomizes the humiliation it suffered at the hands of imperial Western powers during the Second Opium War. 

 The offer to return the heads came from François-Henri Pinault, one of 60 high-powered Frenchmen who are accompanying the French president,François Hollande, this week on his first visit to China. Mr. Hollande is seeking to strengthen diplomatic and trade relations with China, and also brought eight cabinet ministers.

Mr. Hollande has received a warm welcome since landing in Beijing on Thursday. The previous French president, Nicolas Sarkozy, angered Chinese leaders after he met with the Dalai Lama, the exiled Tibetan spiritual leader, in 2008, months after a widespread Tibetan uprising in western China.

“It is easy to forget, watching China emerge as a great power, that the legacy of humiliation at the hands of modern imperialist aggressors back in the 19th century retains a palpable sense of immediacy even today,” said John Delury, a historian at Yonsei University in Seoul who, with Orville Schell, is writing a book on China’s quest for wealth and power. “So what might seem a rather obscure gesture of returning a pair of bronze animal heads takes on outsized significance as a kind of restitution of historical justice, a long-awaited righting of wrongs to the Chinese nation.”

The bronzes emerged as a point of contention between China and France in 2009, when Christie’s auction house handled the sale of the French fashion designer Yves Saint Laurent’s vast art collection after his death. Mr. Pinault is the chief executive officer of Kering, the company that owns Christie’s.

After China failed to block the sale legally, a Chinese businessman made successful bids totaling about $40 million for the heads, then refused to pay, citing national pride.

According to Mr. Pinault’s company, Mr. Pinault acquired them himself and decided to return them to China, which just this month decided to allow Christie’s to become the first international auction house to operate independently on the mainland. Mr. Pinault told Chinese officials that the heads would be returned by the second half of this year.

The State Administration of Cultural Heritage in China said Mr. Pinault’s offer was “an expression of friendship toward the Chinese people,” according to a state news report.

“The Chinese side offers its high praise for this action and considers that it conforms with the spirit of relevant international cultural heritage protection treaties,” the government agency said.

The two bronzes, a rat head and a rabbit head, were among 12 animal heads, replicating the Chinese zodiac, in a central fountain clock at the palace, spewing water to tell time. All disappeared after the palace, also known as Yuanmingyuan and used by rulers of the Qing dynasty, was destroyed by Western troops in 1860.

So iconic are the animal heads that Ai Weiwei, the rebel artist, made a sculpture with versions of all 12. Typical of Mr. Ai, the sculpture was constructed with a sense of irony. It was first displayed in May 2011 at the Pulitzer Fountain in front of the Plaza Hotel in Manhattan while Mr. Ai was being illegally detained in Beijing by security forces, and it quickly came to symbolize the constant conflict in China over issues of free speech.

The China Poly Group, a state-owned enterprise with ties to the People’s Liberation Army that has a museum and theater in Beijing, has acquired several of the animal heads, but the owners and locations of the rest remain unknown.

Mr. Pinault, 50, is the son of Kering’s founder,François Pinault, an art collector. The gift was from the Pinault family. The company has significant stakes in China, where some of its fashion brands, like Gucci, are doing well.

France has a significant trade deficit with China and wants more Chinese investment. But the French president is under some pressure to raise human rights issues with the new Communist Party leadership. Mr. Hollande doled out his criticisms more freely when he was simply the leader of the Socialist Party.

Mr. Hollande wants to reassure the Chinese that his government will protect the security of Chinese tourists in France and intends to discuss making it easier for Chinese to obtain visas.

Mr. Sarkozy had tendentious relations with Beijing after the meeting with the Dalai Lama in 2008. Relations deteriorated that year when Western and Tibetan protesters interrupted the Olympic torch relay when it passed through Paris on the way to Beijing.

Tensions eased just before France took the presidency of the Group of 20 in 2010. Ties became strained again when France criticized China’s reluctance to support the battle against Col.Muammar el-Qaddafi, the Libyan dictator.

Edward Wong reported from Beijing, and Steven Erlanger from Paris.
BEIJING — Feminists are concerned that some Chinese women in their late 20s who are doing well in their careers but are labeled “leftover women” for not having married yet, may be their own worst enemies.
Page Two

Posts written by the IHT’s Page Two columnists.

While they may earn as much as their male counterparts they may still adhere to traditional beliefs that decree a man must earn more than his wife, and men generally share that belief. Either way, this attitude may limit their pool of potential mates.

“They are still living in a traditional mindset and values, even though there’s no way that those can solve their problem,” said Feng Yuan, a feminist and head of Beijing’s Anti-Domestic Violence Network, in a telephone interview. Other feminists agreed with her.

What is missing is a stronger awareness of the dynamics of gender, said Ms. Feng. “If they don’t gain gender consciousness then they can only rely on luck to solve their problem,” she said, meaning they can only hope to solve the problem if they meet a man who earns more than they do.

“Shengnu,” or “leftover woman,” a term applied to China’s well-educated, unmarried women, has long been hurtful for those labeled in that way.

Recently, some have started to push back by swapping it for another word that is pronounced identically but is written differently in Chinese, and has a far more positive meaning: “shengnu,” or “victorious woman,” as I write in my Female Factor Letter today. (Some prefer to render that as “successful.”)

Yet despite the hurt, some women seem unaware that wanting a man to earn more, even when they themselves are equally well-educated and capable, may be working against them.

Zhou Wen, 27 and unmarried, is a secretary at an American marketing company in Beijing. She explained that it’s widely thought a man should earn more than a woman for the match to be right.

“Why aren’t girls prepared to marry a man who earns less? Because income represents your ability,” she said in a telephone interview.

“If you earn less it means you have less ability and no one wants to marry someone with less ability,” she said.

Why not be financially equal, sharing the rent and other living expenses?

“Most people think that equality isn’t just a question of 50-50 on bills,” she said.

“Male-female equality is about making men and women equal and if I contribute 50 percent of everything that doesn’t mean I’m equal,” she said. “Men should respect women, respect their ideas and ways of thinking, and not be the kind of person who says ‘everything a woman says is nonsense,’” she said. That said, she added: “I’m not opposed to going 50-50.”

 The statistic came from a study by the Chinese Academy of Environmental Planning, which is part of the Ministry of Environmental Protection.

The figure of $230 billion, or 1.54 trillion renminbi, is based on costs arising from pollution and damage to the ecosystem, the price that China is paying for its rapid industrialization.

“This cuts to the heart of China’s economic challenge: how to transform from the explosive growth of the past 30 years to the sustainable growth of the next 30 years,” said Alistair Thornton, a China economist at the research firm IHS Global Insight. “Digging a hole and filling it back in again gives you G.D.P. growth. It doesn’t give you economic value. A lot of the activity in China over the last few years has been digging holes to fill them back in again — anything from bailing out failing solar companies to ignoring the ‘externalities’ of economic growth.”

And the costs could be even higher than the ministry’s estimate, he said. The $230 billion figure is incomplete because the researchers did not have a full set of data. Making such calculations is “notoriously difficult,” Mr. Thornton said.

The 2010 figure was reported on Monday by a newspaper associated with the ministry, and so far only partial results of the study are available. In 2006, the ministry began releasing an estimate of the cost of environmental degradation. The ministry has issued statistics only intermittently, though its original goal was to do the calculation — what it called “green G.D.P.” — annually.

The rapidly eroding environment across the country has become an issue of paramount concern to many Chinese. In January, outrage boiled over as air pollution in north China reached record levels, well beyond what Western environmental agencies consider hazardous. The public fury forced propaganda officials to allow official Chinese news organizations to report more candidly on the pollution.

Chinese state-owned enterprises in the oil and power industries have consistently blocked efforts by pro-environment government officials to impose policies that would alleviate the pollution.

There have also been constant concerns over water and soil pollution. The discovery of at least 16,000 dead pigs in rivers that supply drinking water to Shanghai has ignited alarm there. This week, China Central Television reported that farmers in a village in Henan Province were using wastewater from a paper mill to grow wheat. But one farmer said they would not dare to eat the wheat themselves. It is sold outside the village, perhaps ending up in cities, while the farmers grow their own wheat with well water.

The Beijing government on Thursday released details of a three-year plan that is aimed at curbing various forms of pollution, according to a report on Friday in China Daily, an official English-language newspaper. The report quoted Wang Anshun, Beijing’s mayor, as saying that sewage treatment, garbage incineration and forestry development would cost at least $16 billion.

In 2006, the environmental ministry said the cost of environmental degradation in 2004 was more than $62 billion, or 3.05 percent of G.D.P. In 2010, it released partial results for 2008 that totaled about $185 billion, or 3.9 percent of G.D.P. Several foreign scholars have criticized the methods by which Chinese researchers have reached those numbers, saying some crucial measures of environmental degradation are not included in the calculations.

There is consensus now that China’s decades of double-digit economic growth exacted an enormous environmental cost. But growth remains the priority; the Communist Party’s legitimacy is based largely on rapidly expanding the economy, and China officially estimates that its G.D.P., which was $8.3 trillion in 2012, will grow at a rate of 7.5 percent this year and at an average of 7 percent in the five-year plan that runs to 2015. A Deutsche Bank report released last month said the current growth policies would lead to a continuing steep decline of the environment for the next decade, especially given the expected coal consumption and boom in automobile sales.

Patrick Zuo contributed research.


BEIJING — The cost of environmental degradation in China was about $230 billion in 2010, or 3.5 percent of the nation’s gross domestic product — three times that in 2004, in local currency terms, an official Chinese news report said this week. 

THE political calendars of the United States and China follow different cycles, but once every two decades China’s leadership transition occurs simultaneously with the U.S. presidential election. So now, with President Obama’s re-election and Xi Jinping’s anointing as chief of the Chinese Communist Party, both countries have an opportunity to take stock of the bilateral relationship. 

 These two leaders may not want to say it out loud, but they would privately admit that U.S.-China relations are in trouble. While the value of the Chinese currency and trade disputes dominate headlines, the real cause of deteriorating ties is more profound and potentially dangerous. Mutual strategic distrust has escalated in the last two years and is creating a vicious cycle that, if not stopped quickly, could lead to a fierce rivalry harmful to both countries.

Washington and Beijing blame each other for the growing tensions. The Obama administration believes that China’s assertiveness on territorial disputes and its military modernization must be met with countermeasures. Chinese leaders have grown increasingly antagonistic to U.S. diplomatic support for Vietnam, the Philippines and Japan in their territorial disputes with China. Most important, Beijing resents the so-called Asia pivot, Washington’s plan to beef up U.S. naval assets in the Western Pacific.

Thus the top foreign-policy priority for both leaders is to reset the tenor of Sino-American relations. Of course, given the near-collapse in Sino-Japanese relations, Xi will have to devote considerable energy to defusing tensions with Tokyo. But he must be aware of two interlocking realities: that U.S.-China relations are far more critical to China’s long-term interests, and that repairing ties with Tokyo will be only the first, but vital, step in that direction.

There is little doubt that top Chinese leaders are acutely aware of the intrinsic importance of a stable relationship with the United States; such awareness has prevented crises in the past three decades from totally destroying relations. It is also highly likely that China’s new leaders will continue to pursue a pragmatic foreign policy and try to avoid confrontations with the United States.

However, maintaining a fragile status quo is becoming increasingly difficult. Several trends — changes in relative power in China’s favor, the one-sided focus on the military aspect of America’s Asia pivot, escalating territorial disputes that could drag in the United States and China’s military modernization — are exacerbating mutual distrust. Xi and his colleagues need to initiate a policy reset to signal to the second Obama administration that Beijing seeks to put ties on a more solid footing.

A reset could start with concrete measures to resolve territorial disputes with China’s neighbors, particularly Japan, Vietnam and the Philippines. Should Xi succeed, he would be able to demonstrate that China will abide by international law in resolving such issues. Success would remove the most dangerous underlying dynamic in the Sino-American strategic competition in East Asia.

A reset also needs to stabilize the deteriorating security relationship with the United States. This will be difficult because of the strategic distrust caused by the fundamental differences in the political systems of the two countries. Yet, China can still take substantive measures to reverse the adversarial dynamics. Making Sino-American military-to-military exchanges more meaningful and substantive is one. Agreeing on rules to avoid naval accidents is another. Initiating a bilateral dialogue on cybersecurity is absolutely critical in avoiding potentially calamitous incidents.

Granted, Beijing will continue to encounter skepticism from Washington. But if Xi takes the initiative, with concrete proposals, he should find the Obama administration receptive.

To shift American perceptions of his leadership, the third component of Xi’s reset is domestic reform, especially political reform. The conservative backsliding in China over the past decade is the deeper cause of the worsening U.S.-China relationship. Xi can reverse this dynamic, beginning with a more symbolic step, such as releasing Liu Xiaobo, the jailed Nobel Peace Prize laureate, under medical parole.

To be sure, this policy reset would not quickly alter the nature of Sino-American relations, but it would go a long way toward establishing Xi’s credentials as a decisive and forward-looking leader intent upon nurturing a more durable bilateral relationship with Washington.

Relations between the United States and China are on a course that may one day lead to war. 

 This month, Defense Secretary Leon Panetta announced that by 2020, 60 percent of the U.S. Navy will be deployed in the Pacific. Last November, in Australia, President Obama announced the establishment of a U.S. military base in that country, and threw down an ideological gauntlet to China with his statement that the United States will “continue to speak candidly to Beijing about the importance of upholding international norms and respecting the universal human rights of the Chinese people.”

The dangers inherent in present developments in American, Chinese and regional policies are set out in “The China Choice: Why America Should Share Power,” an important forthcoming book by the Australian international affairs expert Hugh White. As he writes, “Washington and Beijing are already sliding toward rivalry by default.” To escape this, White makes a strong argument for a “concert of powers” in Asia, as the best — and perhaps only — way that this looming confrontation can be avoided. The economic basis of such a U.S.-China agreement is indeed already in place.

The danger of conflict does not stem from a Chinese desire for global leadership. Outside East Asia, Beijing is sticking to a very cautious policy, centered on commercial advantage without military components, in part because Chinese leaders realize that it would take decades and colossal naval expenditure to allow them to mount a global challenge to the United States, and that even then they would almost certainly fail.

In East Asia, things are very different. For most of its history, China has dominated the region. When it becomes the largest economy on earth, it will certainly seek to do so. While China cannot build up naval forces to challenge the United States in distant oceans, it would be very surprising if in future it will not be able to generate missile and air forces sufficient to deny the U.S. Navy access to the seas around China. Moreover, China is engaged in territorial disputes with other states in the region over island groups — disputes in which Chinese popular nationalist sentiments have become heavily engaged.

With communism dead, the Chinese administration has relied very heavily — and successfully — on nationalism as an ideological support for its rule. The problem is that if clashes erupt over these islands, Beijing may find itself in a position where it cannot compromise without severe damage to its domestic legitimacy — very much the position of the European great powers in 1914.

In these disputes, Chinese nationalism collides with other nationalisms — particularly that of Vietnam, which embodies strong historical resentments. The hostility to China of Vietnam and most of the other regional states is at once America’s greatest asset and greatest danger. It means that most of China’s neighbors want the United States to remain militarily present in the region. As White argues, even if the United States were to withdraw, it is highly unlikely that these countries would submit meekly to Chinese hegemony.

But if the United States were to commit itself to a military alliance with these countries against China, Washington would risk embroiling America in their territorial disputes. In the event of a military clash between Vietnam and China, Washington would be faced with the choice of either holding aloof and seeing its credibility as an ally destroyed, or fighting China.

Neither the United States nor China would “win” the resulting war outright, but they would certainly inflict catastrophic damage on each other and on the world economy. If the conflict escalated into a nuclear exchange, modern civilization would be wrecked. Even a prolonged period of military and strategic rivalry with an economically mighty China will gravely weaken America’s global position. Indeed, U.S. overstretch is already apparent — for example in Washington’s neglect of the crumbling states of Central America.

To avoid this, White’s suggested East Asian order would establish red lines that the United States and China would both agree not to cross — most notably a guarantee not to use force without the other’s permission, or in clear self-defense. Most sensitively of all, while China would have to renounce the use of force against Taiwan, Washington would most probably have to publicly commit itself to the reunification of Taiwan with China.

Equally important, China would have to acknowledge the legitimacy of the U.S. presence in East Asia, since this is desired by other East Asian states, and the United States would have to acknowledge the legitimacy of China’s existing political order, since it has brought economic breakthrough and greatly enhanced real freedoms to the people of China. Under such a concert, U.S. statements like those of President Obama in support of China’s democratization would have to be jettisoned.

As White argues, such a concert of power between the United States, China and regional states would be so difficult to arrange that “it would hardly be worth considering if the alternatives were not so bad.” But as his book brings out with chilling force, the alternatives may well be catastrophic. 

BEIJING — The United States and China held their highest-level military talks in nearly two years on Monday, with a senior Chinese general pledging to work with the United States on cybersecurity because the consequences of a major cyberattack “may be as serious as a nuclear bomb.” 

 Cybersecurity has become a sudden source of tension between the two countries. China has bristled over the growing body of evidence that its military has been involved in cyberattacks on American corporations and some government agencies. Last month, the Obama administration demanded that the Chinese government stop the theft of data from American computer networks and help create global standards for cybersecurity.

At a news conference on Monday after talks with the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, the Chinese general, Fang Fenghui, said he would be willing to set up a cybersecurity “mechanism,” but warned that progress might not be swift.

“I know how difficult it is,” General Fang said. “Anyone can launch the attacks — from the place where he lives, from his own country or from another country.”

General Dempsey arrived in Beijing on Sunday for his first visit to China. His predecessor, Adm. Mike Mullen, held talks in Beijing in July 2011.

General Dempsey’s three-day visit comes as mistrust has mounted between Beijing and Washington over a host of issues, including differences over North Korea, Washington’s strengthened military posture in the Asia Pacific region, China’s assertiveness in the South and East China Seas and basic problems of how the two militaries should communicate in a crisis.

China invited General Dempsey for the talks after the lengthy transition process to a new Chinese government was completed in March. His arrival followed the first visit by Secretary of State John Kerry more than a week ago, and Obama administration officials say they hope the almost back-to-back talks will yield a starting point for better relations after a rocky period of drift.

At the news conference, General Fang, who is the chief of the People’s Liberation Army General Staff and a member of the powerful Central Military Commission, also talked of wanting a “new kind of military relationship that is consistent with the state-to-state relationship.” He spoke with a confidence that reflected the growing strength of China’s military, including expanding its naval presence.

“The Pacific Ocean is wide enough to accommodate us both,” General Fang said, a suggestion that it was time for the United States to understand the American military would not be able to dominate forever. President Xi Jinping used the same phrase on the eve of his visit to Washington as vice president in February 2012.

General Dempsey did not allow the remark to go unnoticed. The United States, he said, is looking for a “better, deeper and more enduring relationship” with the Chinese military — but in the context of “other historic and enduring alliances.”

“We do have treaty obligations,” he said, a reference to the American alliances with Japan, South Korea, the Philippines and Australia. “We will build and recognize the historic alliances, and there will be points when that creates friction.”

Defending the Obama administration’s decision to “pivot” toward Asia — a policy widely interpreted as a response to China’s expanding influence — General Dempsey said it was not as though “we’ve disappeared and are about to reappear.” He said he had told General Fang in their private conversation before the news conference that the United States sought to be a “stabilizing” factor and that the absence of the United States in the Asia Pacific region would be “destabilizing.”

After a decade of concentrating on Iraq and Afghanistan, the United States will now carry out an Asia Pacific policy of “three mores,” General Dempsey said, bringing more interest, more engagement and more quality assets to the region.

General Fang raised the issue of North Korea’s latest nuclear test, a detonation in February just 100 miles from China’s northeast border.

“North Korea has already concluded a third nuclear test, and it could conduct a fourth nuclear test,” he said.

China is North Korea’s main ally and economic patron, and the United States has urged the Chinese to use their influence to halt the North’s bombast and threats of nuclear attacks on American targets.

General Fang reiterated that China was opposed to North Korea’s developing nuclear weapons, and asked for a reopening of the so-called six-party talks that aimed to persuade the North to abandon its nuclear weapons program. The talks collapsed several years ago. 

HAIKOU, China — China published a national defense paper on Tuesday suggesting that the United States was creating tensions in the Asia-Pacific region by strengthening its military presence and reinforcing its alliances there. The paper, released by the Ministry of Defense, did not declare that the United States was responsible, but the message was clear.

Strongly alluding to the Obama administration’s policy to “pivot” toward a greater focus on the Asia-Pacific region, the paper said, “Some country has strengthened its Asia-Pacific military alliances, expanded its military presence in the region, and frequently makes the situation tenser.” Thus, China has an “arduous task to safeguard its national unification, territorial integrity and development interests.”

Presented at a news briefing in Beijing on Tuesday, the paper has mostly a symbolic significance, defense analysts say. It is useful as a way of understanding the way the Communist Party thinks defense issues should be presented to the public, they say. But it is scarcely looked at by China’s military officers.

Over all, the paper suggested that China should be satisfied with its strategic position and offered a congratulatory note, saying that China “has seized and made the most of this important period of strategic opportunities for its development, and its modernization achievements have captured world attention.” In particular, it singled out a better situation with Taiwan, saying, “Cross-straits relations are sustaining a momentum of peaceful development.”

In an indication that the defense paper reflects a softer tone than the more dominant and nationalistic strand in the Chinese military, the official People’s Liberation Army Daily said in a commentary on Tuesday that the West was trying to contain China, and that this must be resisted.

“Currently, the world situation is undergoing its most profound and complex changes since the end of the cold war,” said the commentary, one in a series that seized on a speech on military matters last month by President Xi Jinping. “Hostile Western forces have stepped up their strategy of imposing Westernization on our country and splitting it up, and they are doing their utmost to fence in and contain our country’s development.”

This year’s paper was released after Secretary of State John Kerry’s visit to Beijing last weekend, his first to China in his new job as America’s top diplomat. That visit was generally friendly but did not result in any changes in China’s policies, most notably its support for North Korea.

The chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, arrives in Beijing early next week on a four-day visit that the Obama administration hopes will yield progress on its goal of better understanding, or at least more communication, between the American and Chinese militaries.

The 40-page document, the first of its kind since 2011, gave some details of the size and makeup of China’s armed forces, in what state media called a demonstration of greater transparency.

The People’s Liberation Army ground force, always known to be by far the biggest service, has 850,000 troops in its mobile operational units, the navy numbers 235,000 service members, and the air force 398,000, the paper said. But the paper appeared to omit some forces from its count, including other ground force units, and the Second Artillery Corps, which controls China’s ballistic missiles.

The Chinese defense white paper for 2006 said that at the end of 2005, the Chinese military had a total of 2.3 million members. It was not explained in the new white paper if the new count of 1.48 million reflected a real reduction in total members.

Dennis J. Blasko, a former United States defense attaché at the American Embassy in Beijing, said the number of navy service members listed in the paper was lower than he and others had estimated. It was generally thought that the navy had 255,000 to 290,000 members, depending on the source, he said. And the number for the air force was higher than previous estimates of 300,000 to 330,000, he said. He also pointed out that the People’s Armed Police was not included in the tallies; those officers belong to a different chain of command.

The paper contained little information of importance to knowledgeable readers, said Mr. Blasko, the author of “The Chinese Army Today: Tradition and Transformation for the 21st Century.”

In outlining the number of members in each of the military services, the military hierarchy may be seeking to present the People’s Liberation Army as a more open organization, said Scott W. Harold, an associate political scientist at the RAND Corporation who specializes in China’s military affairs.

“Alternatively, it is possible that the decision to put out these figures is a part of a move by President Xi Jinping, who is chairman of the Central Military Commission, and his allies to stimulate pressures to restructure the P.L.A.’s asset allocation,” Mr. Harold said. The release of the figures may be connected with Mr. Xi’s call for the military to improve its capacity to fight and win wars, he said.

WASHINGTON — The White House demanded Monday that the Chinese government stop the widespread theft of data from American computer networks and agree to “acceptable norms of behavior in cyberspace.”

The demand, made in a speech by President Obama’s national security adviser, Tom Donilon, was the first public confrontation with China over cyberespionage and came two days after its foreign minister, Yang Jiechi, rejected a growing body of evidence that his country’s military was involved in cyberattacks on American corporations and some government agencies.

The White House, Mr. Donilon said, is seeking three things from Beijing: public recognition of the urgency of the problem; a commitment to crack down on hackers in China; and an agreement to take part in a dialogue to establish global standards.

“Increasingly, U.S. businesses are speaking out about their serious concerns about sophisticated, targeted theft of confidential business information and proprietary technologies through cyberintrusions emanating from China on an unprecedented scale,” Mr. Donilon said in a wide-ranging address to the Asia Society in New York.

“The international community,” he added, “cannot tolerate such activity from any country.”

In Beijing, a spokeswoman for the Chinese Foreign Ministry, Hua Chunying, did not directly say whether the government is willing to negotiate over the proposals spelled out by Mr. Donilon. But at a daily news briefing Tuesday she repeated the government’s position that it opposes Internet attacks and wants “constructive dialogue” with the United States and other countries about cybersecurity issues.

Until now, the White House has steered clear of mentioning China by name when discussing cybercrime, though Mr. Obama and other officials have raised it privately with Chinese counterparts. In his State of the Union address, he said, “We know foreign countries and companies swipe our corporate secrets.”

But as evidence has emerged suggesting the People’s Liberation Army is linked to hacking, the China connection has become harder for the administration not to confront head-on. The New York Times three weeks ago published evidence tying one of the most active of the Chinese groups to a neighborhood in Shanghai that is headquarters to a major cyberunit of the People’s Liberation Army. That account, based in large part on unclassified work done by Mandiant, a security firm, echoed the findings of intelligence agencies that have been tracking the Chinese attackers.

American officials say raising the issue with the Chinese is a delicate balancing act at a time when the United States is seeking China’s cooperation in containing North Korea’s nuclear and missile programs, and joining in sanctions on Iran. Yet they have been expressing their concerns about cyberattacks with Chinese officials for years. Starting in 2010, they invited P.L.A. officials to discuss the issue — a process that has only just started — and last November, Mr. Obama broached the subject at a summit meeting with Prime Minister Wen Jiabao, a senior administration official said.

Since then, the official said, there has been a “perfect storm” of media coverage and protests from the corporate world. Still, he said, Mr. Donilon chose not to mention the P.L.A. in his speech because he did not want to engage in finger-pointing.

“What we are hoping to do,” another senior official said, “is force the Chinese civilian leadership to realize that the P.L.A. is interfering with their foreign policy.”

The Chinese have insisted that they are the victims of cyberattacks, not the perpetrators. On Saturday, the Chinese foreign minister, Yang Jiechi, issued his own call for “rules and cooperation” on cybersecurity and said reports of Chinese military involvement in cyberattacks were “built on shaky ground.”

“Anyone who tries to fabricate or piece together a sensational story to serve a political motive will not be able to blacken the name of others nor whitewash themselves,” Mr. Yang told reporters at the National People’s Congress, which was preparing to ratify the ascension of Xi Jinpingto the Chinese presidency.

Mr. Donilon said the threats to cybersecurity had moved to the forefront of American concerns with China, noting that he was not “talking about ordinary cybercrime or hacking.”

That distinction, a senior administration official said, was meant to separate the theft of intellectual property by Chinese state entities from small-scale hacking by individuals, or the use of cyberweapons by a state to protect its national security. But the distinction between cyberattacks aimed at intellectual property theft and those aimed at disabling a military threat is largely made by Western officials devising legal arguments, not one the Chinese have embraced.

Even as he emphasized the need for international rules to guide cyberactivity, Mr. Donilon made no reference to the billions of dollars the American military and intelligence agencies are spending to develop an arsenal of offensive cyberweapons — to be used against military targets, officials insist, not economic ones. The most famous of these operations was the covert cyberattack mounted by the United States and Israel to disable the centrifuges that Iran uses to enrich uranium at its site in Natanz.

Mr. Donilon sketched out a vigorous agenda in Asia, insisting the United States would keep pursuing its “strategic pivot” toward the region, despite cuts in military spending. He announced that the Treasury Department would impose sanctions on a North Korean bank specializing in foreign-exchange transactions — ratcheting up the pressure on the North Korean government on the day that Pyongyang announced it would no longer abide by the 1953 armistice that halted the Korean War.

With fears about North Korea’s increased nuclear and missile capabilities causing considerable anxiety in Seoul and Tokyo, Mr. Donilon restated a “declaratory policy” that was first formulated by President George W. Bush after the North’s first nuclear test, in 2006. He warned that the United States would reserve the option to retaliate against the North, not just if it used nuclear weapons but if it allowed the “transfer of nuclear weapons or nuclear materials to other states or nonstate entities.”

That formulation did not appear to cover, however, the transfer of technology to build nuclear facilities, as North Korea did in Syria. That reactor was destroyed by Israel in 2007.

“It’s understandable that the people of South Korea would be concerned about the threat they face from the North,” Mr. Donilon said, apparently alluding to talk in the South of building the country’s own nuclear arsenal, a move the United States halted decades ago. Mr. Donilon added that the United States had assets in place “to insure that South Korea’s defense is provided for.”

BO’AO, China — The senior leadership of the Chinese government increasingly views the competition between the United States and China as a zero-sum game, with China the likely long-range winner if the American economy and domestic political system continue to stumble, according to an influential Chinese policy analyst.

China views the United States as a declining power, but at the same time believes that Washington is trying to fight back to undermine, and even disrupt, the economic and military growth that point to China’s becoming the world’s most powerful country, according to the analyst, Wang Jisi, the co-author of “Addressing U.S.-China Strategic Distrust,” a monograph published this week by the Brookings Institution in Washington and the Institute for International and Strategic Studies at Peking University.

Mr. Wang, who has an insider’s view of Chinese foreign policy from his positions on advisory boards of the Chinese Communist Party and the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, contributed an assessment of Chinese policy toward the United States. Kenneth Lieberthal, the director of the John L. Thornton Center for China Studies at Brookings, and a former member of the National Security Council under President Bill Clinton, wrote the appraisal of Washington’s attitude toward China.

In a joint conclusion, the authors say the level of strategic distrust between the two countries has become so corrosive that if not corrected the countries risk becoming open antagonists.

The United States is no longer seen as “that awesome, nor is it trustworthy, and its example to the world and admonitions to China should therefore be much discounted,” Mr. Wang writes of the general view of China’s leadership.

In contrast, China has mounting self-confidence in its own economic and military strides, particularly the closing power gap since the start of the Iraq war. In 2003, he argues, America’s gross domestic product was eight times as large as China’s, but today it is less than three times larger.

The candid writing by Mr. Wang is striking because of his influence and access, in Washington as well as in Beijing. Mr. Wang, who is dean of Peking University’s School of International Studies and a guest professor at the National Defense University of the People’s Liberation Army, has wide access to senior American policy makers, making him an unusual repository of information about the thinking in both countries. Mr. Wang said he did not seek approval from the Chinese government to write the study, nor did he consult the government about it.

It is fairly rare for a Chinese analyst who is not part of the strident nationalistic drumbeat to strip away the official talk by both the United States and China about mutual cooperation.

Both Mr. Wang and Mr. Lieberthal argue that beneath the surface, both countries see deep dangers and threatening motivations in the policies of the other.

Mr. Wang writes that the Chinese leadership, backed by the domestic news media and the education system, believes that China’s turn in the world has arrived, and that it is the United States that is “on the wrong side of history.” The period of “keeping a low profile,” a dictum coined by the Chinese leader Deng Xiaoping in 1989, and continued until now by the departing president, Hu Jintao, is over, Mr. Wang warns.

“It is now a question of how many years, rather than how many decades, before China replaces the United States as the largest economy in the world,” he adds.

China’s financial successes, starting with weathering the 1998 Asian financial crisis and the 2008 global financial crisis, the execution of events like the Beijing Olympics in 2008 and the Shanghai Expo in 2010, contrast with America’s “alarming” deficit, sluggish economic recovery and polarized domestic politics, Mr. Wang says.

He does not address head on the far superior strength of the United States in military weaponry. But he notes that Beijing has developed advanced rocketry and space technology and sophisticated weapons systems without the “United States or the U.S.-led world order.”

In the face of China’s strengths, and worries that the United States will be displaced from its premier position in the world, Washington is engaged in activities including stepped-up spying by American planes and ships along China’s borders that anger the Chinese, particularly its military, Mr. Wang writes.

Promotion of human rights in China by American-supported nongovernmental organizations is viewed as an effort to “Westernize” the country and undermine the Communist Party, a stance the party will not stand for, he says.

That China is increasingly confident that it will prevail in the long run against the United States is backed, in part, by Mr. Lieberthal’s appraisal of American policy toward China.

Mr. Lieberthal cites findings from American intelligence based on internal discussions among crucial Chinese officials that these officials assume “very much a zero-sum approach” when discussing issues directly and indirectly related to United States-China relations.

Because these are privileged communications not intended for public consumption, American officials interpret them to be “particularly revealing of China’s ‘real’ objectives,” he writes.

In turn, American law enforcement officials see an alarming increase in Chinese counterespionage and cyberattacks against the United States that they have concluded are directed by the Chinese authorities to gather information of national interest.

At a seminar last week at Tsinghua University in Beijing, where Brookings finances a study center, Mr. Lieberthal said there was an increasing belief on both sides that the two countries would be “antagonistic in 15 years.”

That would mean major military expenditures by both countries to deter each other, and pushing other countries to take sides. “The worst case is that this could lead to actual armed conflict, although that is by no means a necessary consequence of mutual antagonism,” Mr. Lieberthal said in an interview.

SINGAPORE — Some major multinational companies are concerned that they could be drawn into a potential accounting crisis amid a continuing dispute between U.S. and Chinese financial regulators over access to corporate audit documents.

The standoff over Beijing’s refusal to give regulators in the United States access to audit records for nine Chinese companies listed in North America has the potential not only to force Chinese companies to delist from stock markets in the United States, but could also put American companies that do business in China in a position where they have difficulty producing audited accounts, according to accounting experts.

“The potential consequences of failure to find common ground are almost too frightening to contemplate,” Thomas Shoesmith, a partner at the law firm Pillsbury, said in a note to clients.

This past week, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission charged the Chinese affiliates of five of the world’s biggest auditing firms with violations of U.S. securities law, raising fears that it could go further and ban the affiliates from working on audits of companies listed in the United States.

“If these five accounting firms are barred from practicing before the S.E.C., it seems certain that companies with major Chinese operations will find it difficult or impossible to find accountants,” Mr. Shoesmith said.

U.S. companies with major Chinese operations include businesses like the chip maker Advanced Micro Devices, the fast-food group Yum Brands, the technology firm Qualcomm and the construction equipment maker Caterpillar. Some have begun to show concern about the possible impact of the dispute.

“It would impact us and any other U.S. company with significant operations in China,” said Jonathan Blum, a spokesman for Yum, which operates KFC and Pizza Hut restaurants in China. “Essentially, there would be no auditors in China that the U.S. government would recognize. It will require a diplomatic resolution, I believe, and we are monitoring the situation.”

Caterpillar also appeared eager for a settlement. “As this issue revolves around differences between U.S. and Chinese regulators, Caterpillar hopes each side can work to resolve this issue while demonstrating mutual respect and understanding for the laws and regulations of each country,” the company said in an e-mailed response to questions.

Multinational companies operating in China commonly use Chinese affiliates of the so-called Big Four accounting firms — Deloitte, KPMG, PricewaterhouseCoopers and Ernst & Young — to audit their Chinese business divisions.

In China, the affiliates say that they are prevented by state secrecy laws from releasing audit papers to U.S. regulators. Washington’s reach is also hampered by the structure of the auditing groups, which are set up as global networks of legally separate, national affiliates aimed at insulating the groups from difficulties encountered in specific jurisdictions.

The S.E.C. began proceedings last Monday against the Chinese affiliates of the Big Four as well as the second-tier audit firm BDO. The charges center on the affiliates’ refusal to turn over to the U.S. authorities the paperwork from audits of nine U.S.-listed Chinese companies suspected of possible wrongdoing.

Months of talks between the Chinese Securities Regulatory Commission and U.S. regulators have failed to reach a solution, and lawyers are struggling to see a way forward.

“The C.S.R.C. won’t back down on the State Secrecy Law,” James Zimmerman, a lawyer in Beijing at Sheppard Mullin Richter & Hampton, said of the Chinese commission. “If the S.E.C. and C.S.R.C. are unable to find common ground and reach a consensus, China can expect that the U.S. will stall or refuse to cooperate in other ways in the future. Then it becomes tit-for-tat.”

China’s securities regulator has not commented on the issue since the S.E.C. charged the Chinese auditing affiliates, but it indicated recently that both sides were trying to reach a solution.

“Audit papers are very important to maintain market integrity and the C.S.R.C. is ready to cooperate with other jurisdictions on this issue,” Tong Daochi, the director general of international affairs at the C.S.R.C., said last week at a conference in Hong Kong.

Mr. Tong said his agency had talked with counterparts in the United States and Hong Kong regarding the issue of sharing Chinese audit working papers. “We are making progress and I think we should be able to work out a way to get them out,” he said.

BEIJING — After three days of talks here, America’s top military officer said Wednesday that he believed China wanted to limit the nuclear ambitions of North Korea but that it remained unclear how China would work toward that goal.

Contrary to suggestions by some in the United States that China is not interested in solving the North Korean problem, Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, said the “Chinese leadership is as concerned as we are with North Korea’s march toward nuclearization and ballistic missile technology.”

“And they have given us an assurance that they are working on it, as we are.” He added, “But I didn’t gain any insights into particularly how they would do that.”

General Dempsey met Tuesday with the Chinese leadership, including President Xi Jinping and Gen. Fan Changlong, the vice chairman of the Central Military Commission, which runs the Chinese Army, Navy and Air Force.

They were the most senior-level talks between the American and Chinese militaries in nearly two years. Because of the long gap in direct communication, and the growing distrust between the two sides over China’s fast military modernization and assertive behavior in the East China and South China Seas, General Dempsey arrived with a major set of issues concerning China’s military behavior.

As a symbol of how China’s maritime power is growing, a senior Chinese military officer announced Tuesday in the middle of General Dempsey’s visit that China would build a second aircraft carrier and that it would be more sophisticated than the first carrier launched last year. The officer, Song Xue, deputy chief of staff of the Chinese Navy, said the “next aircraft carrier we need will be larger and carry more fighters.”

At a news conference with reporters based in China, General Dempsey said he warned the Chinese military leaders that the United States would abide by its alliance with Japan in the dispute between China and Japan over who owns the islands known as the Senkaku by Japan and the Diaoyu by China.

Chinese vessels have been challenging Japanese ships off the islands, which are administered by Japan, since the dispute erupted in September. Xi Jinping, who was vice president at the time, advised the United States to keep out of the argument.

On Tuesday, eight Chinese patrol ships approached the islands, the largest contingent to appear at one time since September. The Chinese news agency, Xinhua, said the Chinese ships had forced Japanese fishing boats out of the waters around the islands.

Western defense analysts have said the Chinese continue to send surveillance vessels close by the islands to test whether the United States will live up to its alliance obligations with Japan.

General Dempsey said he left no doubt in his discussions with Chinese officials that “we do have certain treaty obligations with Japan that we would honor.”

On the contentious issue of cyberattacks, General Dempsey said he asked the Chinese “to put a team of their best and brightest” together to work with the Americans on seeking rules of conduct on computer security.

In the past month, the Obama administration has criticized China for what it calls mounting evidence that the Chinese military was involved in the widespread theft of data from American computer networks, particularly those of American corporations.

China’s leadership appears to have heard the Obama administration’s admonitions that it will not tolerate the practice of cyberattacks aimed at intellectual property and gaining commercial secrets from American businesses, American officials say.

The Chinese agreed during a recent visit of Secretary of State John Kerry to join a “cyber working group” with the Americans. “There has to be some kind of code of conduct established,” General Dempsey said.

But the Chinese apparently did not give any answers to General Dempsey on whether they intended to stop these activities, as specifically requested by the Obama administration.

At the start of General Dempsey’s visit on Monday, a senior Chinese general, Fang Fenghui, said that breaches in cybersecurity could result in as much damage as a nuclear attack.

HSIPAW, Myanmar — As Chinese workers in hard hats and red overalls bulldoze deep trenches into the orange soil across northern Myanmar for gas and oil pipelines to China, China’s largest energy conglomerate is paying cash for land and trees in the pipelines’ path, and building schools and health clinics for some of the poorest people on earth.

The compensation offered by the China National Petroleum Corporation reflects a bitter lesson China learned about doing business in the new, more democratic Myanmar when construction on a major Chinese hydroelectric dam there was suspended last year after a groundswell of outrage erupted over what was seen as China’s imperious attitude toward Myanmar’s people and its environment.

The gentler approach also reflects hard calculations in an escalating battle with the United States for regional influence. As Myanmar loosens the grip of decades of military dictatorship and improves ties with the United States, China fears a threat to a strategic partnership that offers access to the Indian Ocean and a long-sought shortcut for oil deliveries from the Middle East.

With the United States reasserting itself in Asia, and an emboldened China projecting military and economic power as never before, each side is doing whatever it can to gain the favor of economically struggling, strategically placed Myanmar.

The Obama administration would like a swift foreign policy success in an election year. Having another country move from dictatorship toward democracy on President Obama’s watch would be a political achievement; having a friendly country on China’s border would be a strategic one.

But the United States is handicapped in delivering meaningful assistance by economic sanctions that Congress is reluctant to lift. Myanmar must conduct fair parliamentary elections on Sunday, settle conflicts with ethnic minorities and release more political prisoners before more than two decades of harsh sanctions can be removed, administration officials say.

China, Myanmar’s chief patron for decades, wants to maintain a relationship that will allow unfettered access to Myanmar’s energy resources. But the Chinese, accustomed to unwavering loyalty from Myanmar at the United Nations and other diplomatic forums, are faced with a new government led by President U Thein Sein that has shown signs of wanting to be less dependent on its old friend and more responsive to its citizens’ concerns.

In perhaps the most visible symbol of Myanmar’s new openness to the West, Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton visited in December, the first secretary of state to do so in more than 50 years. Photographs of her shaking hands with the revered opposition leader, Daw Aung San Suu Kyi, women of similar age in white jackets, their hair drawn back in ponytails, radiant smiles on their faces, now hang in cafes and homes, an impossibility six months ago.

Mrs. Clinton tempered her visit with warnings that economic sanctions would not be lifted as fast as Myanmar would like. Even so, the United States restored full diplomatic relations, a reward for Myanmar’s political and economic changes so far.

In a counterpunch, Chinese officials blamed American meddling for the suspension of the $3.6 billion dam project last September, and said the American diplomatic effort was a direct challenge in its backyard.

“It is hard for the Chinese to see the United States push into Myanmar as not about China,” said Yun Sun, a Chinese foreign policy expert based in Washington. “The United States is a global power. It’s natural it would want a relationship with Myanmar. But China had a monopoly, and if you have to share it, it makes it difficult to swallow. That’s why the Chinese are angry.”

A prominent Chinese historian, Qin Hui of Tsinghua University in Beijing, warned his government that blaming the West’s meddling for the dam rebuff missed the point. The people of Myanmar had expressed “exceedingly broad-based opposition” to building a dam at the headwaters of the Irrawaddy River, the nation’s biggest waterway, he wrote.

China still enjoys a strong position in Myanmar.

The two authoritarian governments have known how to do business in closed-door deals on arms sales and megaprojects that critics say are laced with corruption. While Myanmar was isolated by international sanctions, China was its main foreign investor, and it has the advantage of proximity over a long border. Beijing has plowed billions of dollars into the country, and the United States cannot compete with that, American officials say.

Washington is limited under the sanctions to offering about $30 million a year in humanitarian aid, an American official said, even as the United States Agency for International Development seeks to establish a presence.

Sandwiched between the United States and China are some Myanmar businessmen who see American-backed reforms as the best solution to the chronically weak economy and fear that the slow easing of American sanctions could work in China’s favor.

One businessman, who declined to be quoted by name because free speech can still be an uncertain proposition in Myanmar, said that if the United States insisted on maintaining sanctions and the economy failed to take off, China would come to the rescue with the old-style cronyism of big loans and huge infrastructure projects. The new gas pipeline alone, scheduled to open next year, will bring billions of dollars in royalties and transit fees. The oil pipeline to be finished after that will also offer sizable revenue.

For that reason, Washington needs to take a more pragmatic approach, said Aung Naing Oo, the Burmese deputy director of the Vahu Development Institute, a Thailand-based organization set up by refugees from Myanmar, also known as Burma. “They should do more than talking,” he said of the Obama administration. “By continuing the sanctions, the United States is inadvertently helping those who want to take us back to the old ways.”

For now, China feels burned by Myanmar on the dam project.

The dam had provoked an outpouring of nationwide opposition, backed by Ms. Aung San Suu Kyi, and brought into the open a nascent antipathy to China, as well as to the ethnic Chinese population.

The dam on the Irrawaddy River, which has near mythic significance in Burmese culture, was being built by one of China’s biggest state-run power companies, China Power Investment. About 90 percent of the dam’s power was destined for Yunnan Province in China although, according to the World Bank, less than 20 percent of households in Myanmar have electricity.

Thousands of villagers were forcibly resettled by the military. They were given some compensation, including 21-inch television sets.

Opposition to the dam remains strong near the site at Myitsone. Some residents of nearby Tanghpre tried to return home this month from a relocation camp. At the red-brick Roman Catholic Church of the Columbine Mission, Sister Lydia sobbed as she told how the police had detained her when she helped some of her congregation return.

On March 17, Sister Lydia lost her battle. The villagers she had assisted were bundled up by the military and taken back to their Chinese-built homes in the relocation camp. A sign in Tanghpre said: government property.

In a signal that the company has not given up, Lu Qizhou, the head of China Power Investment, said at a news conference in Beijing this month that mistakes had been made and that the company would try to take better care of the local population. Whether the Myanmar government succumbs to Chinese displeasure and allows the dam construction to resume remains unclear.

Meanwhile, the pipeline project — which starts at a deep-sea port on the Bay of Bengal and is being built by China National Petroleum, operators of projects in nearly a dozen countries — proceeds at an urgent pace. Trucks laden with pipes trundle through villages around the clock. Bulldozers dig trenches 12 hours a day.

The company is making relatively generous payments to cash-starved farmers to move off the rich soil that grew luxuriant crops of watermelons, castor beans and mangoes.

A quarter-acre farm fetches about $10,000 and a large mango tree about $400, according to local businessmen in Hsipaw. In a flash of the kind of corporate responsibility increasingly practiced by Western natural resource companies, the Chinese corporation recently built a health clinic in one of the villages close to the pipeline, a sturdy concrete structure that contrasts with the flimsy bamboo houses.

About six miles northeast of Mandalay, the second biggest city, the company donated a new school.

“They built a pipeline near here for their own economy,” said Daw Swe Oo, a math teacher. “They take a lot of our resources and donate back a little here and there. But I am just happy and excited to have a nice new school to teach in.”
LAST week, anti-Japanese protests swept nearly a dozen Chinese cities. Angry demonstrators overturned Toyotas while Japanese restaurants and businesses were vandalized. In the central Chinese city of Chengdu, where thousands protested, some banners declared, “Even if China is covered with graves, we must kill all Japanese!”

The immediate cause for the demonstrations was a flare-up over a few disputed, uninhabited islands controlled by Japan. (China calls them the Diaoyus; Japan calls them the Senkakus). On Aug. 15, Chinese nationalists landed and planted flags on the islands before being deported. Japanese nationalists retaliated by swimming ashore from nearby boats, further inflaming Chinese passions.

The rage of China’s crowds is genuine, and its roots lie in China’s nationalist ideology. The Chinese Communist Party uses its educational and propaganda systems to socialize citizens into a particular understanding of history. Maoist triumphalism has been eclipsed since the mid-1990s by a new “victim narrative” about Chinese suffering.

To most Chinese, the Japanese are “devils,” and the hatred reaches far into the past — from China’s humiliating loss in the Sino-Japanese War of 1894-5 to World War II-era atrocities like the Rape of Nanking. Anti-Japanese anger has both ethical and visceral dimensions, sustaining it unlike other more fleeting forms of nationalism.

And although Chinese nationalist rage is primarily aimed at Japan, it is also directed toward the United States. As Chinese nationalists see it, America is the cause of China’s continuing problems with both Taiwan and Japan. If it were not for the “American imperialists” inserting the United States Seventh Fleet in the Taiwan Strait during the Korean War, they say, Taiwan would long ago have been reunified with mainland China, erasing that “national humiliation.” And Japan’s continuing impertinence is also America’s fault: the United States’ alliance with Japan gives Japanese nationalists the gumption to defy a rising China.

The statements of American politicians further stoke Chinese anger at the United States. Speaking in Ohio late last week, the presumptive Republican vice-presidential nominee, Paul D. Ryan, accused China of stealing intellectual property, blocking access to its markets and manipulating the exchange rate. “President Obama promised he would stop these practices,” Mr. Ryan declared. “He said he’d go to the mat with China. Instead, they’re treating him like a doormat. We’re not going to let that happen.”

Mr. Ryan’s views echo those of Mitt Romney, who has promised if elected to declare China a “currency manipulator.” This could lead to punitive tariffs on Chinese imports and a possible trade war.

There is a long history of challengers using China to attack incumbents during presidential elections. Most famously, in 1992, Bill Clinton accused President George Bush of coddling the “butchers of Beijing” following the Tiananmen Square massacre of 1989.

While there is some antipathy toward China in the Democratic Party, particularly among labor unions and human rights activists, anti-Chinese sentiment these days comes mostly from the right. Economic conservatives don’t like the income redistribution and government regulation they associate with socialism; the Christian right fears the atheism of “Godless” Communism; and libertarians don’t like any government at all, let alone the authoritarian government of China.

China-bashing will therefore be good election year politics for the Romney-Ryan ticket. But it will be bad for America’s relations with China and could undermine our national security. Many Chinese are already suspicious of American intentions, and ideologically driven rhetoric from across the Pacific will only confirm their worst fears.

Worse, the Communist Party is currently undergoing its own leadership transition, and it is happening at a time when popular nationalism is bringing people into the streets. Because the party bases its legitimacy in large part on its nationalist credentials, no party leader is likely to quiet the nationalists until the new leadership is finalized.

Lacking a secure foundation of mutual trust, American-Chinese relations today remain susceptible to the random accidents of history that have plagued them in the past. In 1999, the mistaken NATO bombing of the Chinese Embassy in Belgrade, Serbia, killed three and led to huge anti-American protests across China. And in 2001, the collision between a Chinese jet and an American surveillance plane led to a Chinese pilot’s death and an American crew’s being detained for two weeks.

If comparable accidents occur during this fall’s leadership transitions in both countries, popular pressure for more confrontational policies in both China and the United States will be more difficult to contain — and will increase the likelihood of conflict in Asia.

Peter Hays Gries is a professor of international and area studies at the University of Oklahoma and the director of its Institute for U.S.-China Issues.
WASHINGTON — Say there was a way to create a half-million American jobs over the next two years without adding a dime to the debt or deficit. And say it would also revive moribund Rust Belt factories, reduce the country’s gaping trade deficit and help stabilize the international economic system.

All of this would occur, some economists say, if only China would stop manipulating its currency, keeping it artificially undervalued as a means of boosting its exports and fueling its tremendous economic growth.

Anger over China’s exchange-rate policy nearly boiled over in Congressional hearings last week. Treasury Secretary Timothy F. Geithner accused China of violating international norms. President Obama plans to press the currency issue, along with complaints about China’s policies on trade and intellectual property, at the Group of 20 summit meeting in South Korea in November.

That China has undervalued its currency, the renminbi, for much of the past decade to boost its surging export-driven economy is not seriously doubted; China intervenes in the markets by buying an estimated $1 billion a day using renminbi. For the lay observer, it’s befuddling. Why does this situation persist?

Would China benefit by letting the renminbi rise?

Yes, most experts agree that China would probably be better off if the renminbi’s value rose. Doing so would give Chinese consumers more purchasing power, lessen the risk of inflation and asset bubbles, and potentially reduce stark inequalities that have contributed to social unrest.

What’s stopping China, then?

Exporters, concentrated along the southern coast, wield enormous clout in Beijing and benefit from an undervalued currency, said Minxin Pei, a political scientist at Claremont McKenna College in Claremont, Calif. So do state-owned enterprises, which have excess capacity and need to be able to sell goods cheaply abroad. China’s importers are unhappy with the undervalued renminbi — as are officials at the central bank — but both groups are relatively weak.

In the United States, there must be someone against a stronger Chinese currency, right?

Large multinational corporations, and Wall Street, are comfortable with a weak renminbi. Many of the biggest American conglomerates make goods in China (or sell them in the United States) and benefit from the undervalued currency. Financial services companies find deal-making easier with a strong dollar and want to help invest the capital sloshing around China.

But aren’t the forces on the other side just as strong?

A high dollar places tremendous competitive pressure on American agricultural producers and domestic manufacturers, and thereby hampers job creation.

So, it’s not surprising that Midwest politicians and labor unions have been among China’s fiercest critics. High unemployment has also prompted the White House and most Congressional Democrats (and a substantial number of Republicans) to side with the critics.

How have previous problems with a strong dollar been handled?

In the late 1960s, rising federal spending during the Vietnam War and the Great Society pushed inflation upward. The United States had a trade deficit for the first time in the postwar era. Manufacturers were furious. President Richard M. Nixon responded by taking the country off the gold standard in 1971, which caused the dollar to fall by about 20 percent.

From 1981 to 1985, the dollar soared again, as the Federal Reserve boosted interest rates to combat inflation and the Reagan administration borrowed to finance big budget deficits. In September 1985, Treasury Secretary James A. Baker III met Japanese and German officials at the Plaza Hotel in Manhattan. Faced with threats of protectionist action by Congress, the two countries agreed on a plan to devalue the dollar.

So, could such an agreement happen again?

A rapid devaluation of the dollar is unlikely anytime soon. No country, even an ally, wants to see its currency suddenly rise in value (and its exports become more expensive) amid a fragile global recovery. The international monetary system has also gotten more complex, with the creation of the euro and the rise of large emerging economies like Brazil, India and Russia.

Though China allowed its currency to rise by more than 20 percent against the dollar from 2005 to 2008, the financial crisis (which led investors to flock to the dollar) led to a return to old ways. In June, Beijing promised greater exchange-rate flexibility, but since then the renminbi has risen by only about 1 percent. Too little, too late, Mr. Geithner testified last week.

Ultimately, says Jeffry A. Frieden, a Harvard political scientist, exchange rates reflect broader macroeconomic forces. For the dollar to get back in sync, Americans must save and invest more and consume and borrow less, and the Chinese, Germans and Japanese have to recognize that excessive reliance on exports is not to their long-run advantage.

“It’s conceivable that the Chinese might conclude it’s in their own self-interest to let the currency rise,” Professor Frieden said, “but it’s not going to come from browbeating and it’s not even going to come from well-meaning attempts at cooperation.”


Fifty-five percent of the American public holds a favorable view of China, while 59 percent of the Chinese public has a similar feeling about the United States, according to a new survey.
HONG KONG — Two-thirds of Americans now see China as a serious or potential military threat to the United States. Nearly six in 10 Chinese believe their country is destined to become the world’s leading superpower, and increasing numbers of everyday Chinese believe the United States is trying to prevent them from achieving that status.

Most Americans don’t believe that U.S. media outlets report truthfully about China, and about half of Chinese feel the same way about their media. Six in 10 Americans think the U.S. government has done a poor job handling relations with China — although things have improved since 2007 — while two-thirds of Chinese think Beijing is mishandling relations with Washington.



For the general Chinese public, corruption is the No. 1 concern, followed by jobs and the economy, a growing wealth gap and the rise in housing prices. But Chinese opinion leaders worry most about a decline in morality, followed by concerns over Taiwan, while business leaders cite HIV/AIDS as their top issue.

These are some of the takeaways from U.S.-China Public Perceptions, a new opinion poll from the Committee of 100, a nonpartisan Chinese-American group in New York that promotes cultural exchanges. The survey was conducted in December 2011 and January of this year, with 4,153 interviews in China and 1,400 in the United States.

Fifty-five percent of the American public holds a favorable view of China, while 59 percent of the Chinese public has a similar feeling about the United States.

“The two peoples like each other,” said Charlie Woo, a Committee of 100 member and the chief executive of Megatoys, a toy manufacturer based in California and Hong Kong. (His interview with the broadcaster Tavis Smiley about the poll results is here.)

But other polls this year have turned up decidedly less rosy results about the bilateral connection. A Pew survey found that just 40 percent of Americans viewed China favorably, down from 51 percent last year but about the same as in 2007. Year-by-year results from Pew can be found here.

A recent Gallup-China Daily USA poll showed just 42 percent of Americans with a favorable view of China, with 44 percent unfavorable. Among those Americans who said they closely followed news about China, the favorability went down markedly, to 54 percent unfavorable. But more than half of younger respondents, aged 18-34, saw China in a favorable light.

About eight in 10 Americans think a close relationship with China is a good thing, Gallup found, although six in 10 believe China’s growing influence in the world is a bad thing.

When Gallup posed an open-ended question in February about which nation was the United States’ leading enemy, China was second only to Iran and was seen as far more worrisome than the rest of the top five put together — North Korea, Afghanistan and Iraq.

Mr. Woo, the Committee of 100 member, did note that “on both sides, there’s a lack of trust.” Among U.S. business leaders, for example, 55 percent believed there was poor protection of intellectual property rights in China — twice the percentage the committee found in its 2007 survey. U.S. executives said corruption was their No. 2 concern about doing business in China.

The committee’s survey found that the countries deemed most important to Americans were, in descending order, China, Britain, Japan and Israel. For the Chinese it was the United States, Russia, Britain and Japan.

Three-quarters of Chinese respondents say their country is on the right track, down from nearly 90 percent five years ago. Conversely, 36 percent of Americans think the United States is on the right track — about the same as in 2007.

There is a clear indication from recent polls that everyday Chinese and Americans see value and importance in a stronger bilateral relationship, although the lack-of-trust issue remains a concern. So for a flash survey among globally engaged Rendezvous readers, what is your take on Sino-American relations?

What are you most worried about? And what are you encouraged by? Tell us what you think about human rights in China, food safety, environmental degradation, a downturn in the Chinese economy, political gridlock in Washington, military tensions in the Asia-Pacific region — or anything else.
And as always, speak freely.

"China's rise" can be seen as a quintessentially political process—through which the ruling Communist Party has sought to shore up its legitimacy after the Cultural Revolution irreversibly changed the nation and caused three crises of ideological belief, faith in the CPC, and confidence in the future. As the Party realized that the performance-based legitimacy was the only hope for prolonging its rule, economic development became the highest politics. Consequentially, the success of economic development would have to cause political implications—the external ones are carefully monitored and evaluated by China's neighbors and the only superpower of the world—the United States.

Will China become a threat to the United States, Japan, and surrounding countries? The reason for American concern mainly arises from its hegemonic status in the world politics and the ideological incompatibility of China with the Western value system. China's stunning economic growth has convinced the West that it is just a matter of time until China becomes a world superpower. But its ideological orientation makes China a revolutionary power that is threatening both to the United States' status and global structure. Three different logics have been constructed to substantiate the "China threat" thesis. First, ideological and cultural factors make China a threat. For neo-conservatives in the Bush Administration, the mere factor that China still sticks to communism makes view it adversely. Samuel Huntington has added a cultural factor: in the clash of civilizations, the "unholy alliance between Islamic and Confucian civilizations" is the most fundamental threat to the West. For people using this logic, the sensible response from the U.S. is, in the short run, a containment policy, and confrontation is possible if needed; in the long run, the promotion of a peaceful transformation within China. Second, geopolitical and geoeconomic factors. For many realists, even China has shed off its ideological straitjacket, as a great power in size (territory, population, and economy), China has to pursue its own interest and respect. Nationalism may still drive China into a course of clash with the United States, if the latter refuses to accommodate or share the leadership with China as a rising power. Some scholars fear that democracy can unleash strong nationalism and popular nationalism can make China even more aggressive toward the United States. Third, the collapse of China. Opposed to the previous two perspectives, some people are concerned that if China suffers a Soviet-style sudden-death syndrome and spins out of control, it can create an even worse scenario. The sheer size of the population makes refuge problem, the failed state and the followed crises (warlordism, civil war, crime, proliferation of nuclear weapons, etc) impossible for the world to deal with. Due to these three different considerations, the United States often oscillates from demonization to romaticization of China, from containment to engagement. The U.S.-China relationship has shifted from conflict, to confrontation, to competition and back to conflict, but so rarely features with cooperation. One American China specialist characterizes the bilateral relationship as "the sweet-and-sour Sino-American relationship."

The Japanese have a different set of reasons to feel upset by China's rise. Although Japan has been culturally indebted to China since the Tang dynasty, somehow Japan has developed a strong Oedipus complex toward China—namely to commit patricide against its cultural patron. In the past century, China suffered several severe acts of aggression at the hands of the Japanese. The mutual animosity between these two countries has been strong. The Japanese deep involvement in Taiwan, its stubborn refusal to offer unequivocal apologies to the Asian neighboring countries over its aggressions, and American military alliance with Japan all have been irksome to the Chinese. The construction of Chinese nationalism by mainly relying on anti-Japanese sentiment among the Chinese turned Japan into an easy target. To some degree, the Chinese leadership has tried to release the popular anger against the regime by directing it either to the local tyrants or to the international bullies (U.S. and Japan are two natural candidates). Now Japan and China still have not developed any framework to resolve their territorial disputes and their relationship has reached a low point. The Chinese often suspect that U.S. and Japan are the originators of a variety of "China threat" arguments.

In addition to the ideological threat, many other neighboring countries have more stakes in China's new move. For Southeast Asian nations, the presence of a sizeable and extremely rich Chinese ethnic group and their increasing dependency upon China's economy for growth forced them to be very careful in handling their relationship with China. With a continental size (China has almost two times the territorial and population sizes of all other Asian Pacific countries combined), China consumes a tremendous amount of foreign direct investment and pops out huge volume of exports; other countries feel the competition from China. At this moment, no government in the Asian Pacific region has adopted a clear anti-China policy; but sporadic anti-Chinese riots have occurred in Malaysia, Indonesia, the Philippines; and strong resentment against the Northern economic and cultural invasion has surfaced in Myanmar (former Burma), Thailand, Vietnam, and other countries. Even Singapore—the self-proclaimed third Chinese territory in addition to China and Taiwan—was upset by China's strong hand in 2004 after Lee Hsien Loong, the soon-to-be-inaugurated Prime Minister of Singapore, visited Taiwan.

The combination of stunning economic growth and unpredictable political governance causes deep concerns about China among the nations in the world. The Chinese leadership has realized the urgency to calm down these concerns and to build a supportive international environment for its ascendancy. To make its rise less a threat, the Chinese government has sponsored many PR events, such as exhibitions in foreign countries, promoting Chinese language programs, and so on. But most importantly, the Chinese premier Wen Jiabao put forward the thesis of "China's peaceful rise" in his speech to a Harvard University audience in December 2003. Under this thesis, there are several points: First, China's development depends upon and in return will contribute to the world peace; second, China will resort to peaceful means for development; third, China's development will rely more on its own resources and market; fourth, China is prepared for a long-term process of hard work, even several generations, for economic prosperity. Finally, even as China has achieved its economic development, it will not seek hegemony in the world or come out as a threat to any country.

Under the guiding principle of "China's peaceful rise," the Chinese government has conducted actively diplomacy at four (at least) different levels: (1) Creating strategic partnerships with the second-tier powers. China has signed strategic partnership treaties with the EU, Russia and India to strengthen their relationships as well as to balance the American power. (2) Promoting "good neighbor policy" in the Asian Pacific region. By increasing trade with the Asian-Pacific region and also let these countries enjoy trade surplus with China, China has positioned as an important trading partner with these countries. Besides, China has entered into various mechanisms of regional cooperation with these countries. During the 1997 Asian financial crises, that China refrained from devaluing its currency and helped stabilize the regional economy by mobilizing its foreign currency reserve won positive reactions from this region and the U.S. (3) Seeking cooperation and avoiding confrontation with the U.S. The Chinese side basically has sent to Washington a clear message that China is a conservative power and has no intention to upset the status quo—namely the U.S. as the sole superpower in the world. (4) Neglecting Japan. As China has successfully managed relationships with the sole superpower, the second-tier strategic partners, and neighboring countries, China is able to afford to ignore Japan and occasionally show some toughness.

For the past five years, the Chinese leadership has been cautious and successful in managing the internal nationalism and American unilateralism, to some degree, thanks to the anti-terror war. Now some signs have indicated that the honeymoon between the U.S. and China in the aftermath of Sept.11 attack and anti-terrorism coalition has arrived at its end. If the United States shifts its policy to a hard-line toward China, the cyclical turbulence in the Sino-American relationship may soon resurface. This might jeopardize China's plan of a peaceful rise. At the micro-level, the U.S. seems to have been more provocative toward China, the latter has been more on defensive; but if we look at the Sino-U.S. relationship from the macro-level, it seems that China can take back initiative if it can remove the thorn of communist ideology and authoritarianism, because the Americans tend to believe that under the doctrine of democratic peace, democratic countries do not fight war against each other. Therefore, to create long-term internal and external stability, the CPC has to learn how to play the card of democracy. Does this amount to ask a leopard to change its spots?


As the instructor enters the classroom in Kathmandu, students rise from their seats and collectively greet him in Mandarin Chinese - "Ni hao! (Hello!)".

Each morning this group of about 20 boys and girls gather in a dingy, two-room flat above shops in a crowded Kathmandu market to learn Chinese. They are convinced that learning the new language will open up job opportunities.

"Over a billion people live in China, and even if just 1% of them visit Nepal every year, we will get a lot of employment," said student Raju Shreshtha, who wants to work as a tour guide.

A number of private institutions offering Chinese lessons have sprung up in the past few years in Nepal, a country sandwiched between the two Asian powers of India and China.

The Chinese government is actively encouraging Nepalese people to learn the language.

It has even sent instructors to Kathmandu to give free lessons and set up the Confucius Centre at Kathmandu University to "spread Chinese language and culture".

As the instructor enters the classroom in Kathmandu, students rise from their seats and collectively greet him in Mandarin Chinese - "Ni hao! (Hello!)".

Each morning this group of about 20 boys and girls gather in a dingy, two-room flat above shops in a crowded Kathmandu market to learn Chinese. They are convinced that learning the new language will open up job opportunities.

"Over a billion people live in China, and even if just 1% of them visit Nepal every year, we will get a lot of employment," said student Raju Shreshtha, who wants to work as a tour guide.

A number of private institutions offering Chinese lessons have sprung up in the past few years in Nepal, a country sandwiched between the two Asian powers of India and China.

The Chinese government is actively encouraging Nepalese people to learn the language.

It has even sent instructors to Kathmandu to give free lessons and set up the Confucius Centre at Kathmandu University to "spread Chinese language and culture".


Raju Shreshtha is among the many learning Chinese in Nepal
As Nepal grapples with political uncertainty after years of Maoist armed rebellion and a seemingly unending peace process, Beijing is vigorously stepping up its engagement with Kathmandu.

It is focusing on investment, cultural exchange and heightened contact at all political levels.

Ahead of elections to Nepal's Constituent Assembly due in November, China is inviting leaders of important political parties for consultations, beginning with former prime minister and powerful Maoist leader Pushpa Kamal Dahal, more popularly known as Prachanda, who has just returned from Beijing.

Experts say China is also developing itself as an international educational hub, doubling the number of scholarships to attract Nepalese students.

"Traditionally the Nepalese elite used to go to India for higher education. But soon a day will come when the future leadership of Nepal will be educated in Beijing and Shanghai rather than in Indian universities in Allahabad, Varanasi and Patna," said senior Nepali journalist and analyst Yubaraj Ghimire.

All this is making China's regional rival, India, uncomfortable.

Continue reading the main story
“
Start Quote

The Himalayas are no longer a barrier between China and Nepal”

Kanak Mani Dixit,
Editor of Himal Southasian
"India should watch out for Chinese activities in Nepal and if China starts spreading its influence southwards to the Terai region, then it's worrying for India," said Deb Mukherjee, India's former ambassador in Kathmandu.

Given the long history of mutual mistrust, an armed conflict in 1962 and the unresolved border dispute between the two countries, India is watching China's increasing interest in Nepal with a certain degree of suspicion.

Investment trend
Even though China is still far behind India in terms of overall investment in Nepal, officials say it will soon catch up.

China signed a deal with Nepal in 2012 to invest $1.6bn (£1bn) in the 750-megawatt hydropower project in West Seti, one of the largest power projects in Nepal.

A Chinese company is constructing the indigenously-funded 456-megawatt hydropower project in the Upper Tamakoshi region.

"As of now India is the largest investor in Nepal, but this trend is changing," said Dhruba Rajbanshi, director-general of the Department of Industry.

"Now China wants to invest in big hydropower projects and if that happens the Chinese investment will become really huge."

Chinese officials have said they want to use Nepal as a transit point to spread their business across to South Asia. This is another reason for India's discomfort, because it is already inundated by Chinese goods.

Road building

Nepalese students of Mandarin believe Chinese tourism will bring more jobs
As a first step to push its business interests beyond Nepal via the land route, China has undertaken various projects to develop road networks across the Himalayas.

It is modernising the 115km (71-mile) Araniko Highway, which connects Kathmandu to the Chinese border near the town of Kodari.

China is also investing $20m to upgrade the 17km dirt track between Nepal's Syaphrubesi and Kerung in Tibet. On the other side of the border it has already built Highway 318, which leads to Lhasa and ultimately to Shanghai.

"The Himalayas are no longer a barrier between China and Nepal," said Kanak Mani Dixit, editor of Himal Southasian.

He said there was an undeclared understanding between the first prime minister of independent India, Jawaharlal Nehru, and then Chinese Premier Zhou Enlai that Nepal should remain in India's sphere of influence.

"Now things are different. With growing instability in Nepal, Chinese interests and influence have also grown," Mr Dixit said.

"Concomitant to that, India is also becoming wary of China's moves in its neighbourhood."

Although bridging the huge cultural, linguistic and religious gaps with Nepal will remain a challenge for China for a long time to come, India is aware that China plans ahead and that it will not give up easily.

Now Delhi is now faced with the question of how it will respond to growing ties between China and Nepal.

China poisoning case sparks White House petitions flurry

China has the world's largest number of internet users
Continue reading the main story
Related Stories
China sacks 'sex tape' official
China sacks 'smiling official'
Five lives changed by China's Twitter
A 19-year-old poisoning case has sparked a rush of interest in the US White House petitions site from Chinese internet users.

Over 130,000 users have signed a petition demanding the US investigate a woman they call a suspect in the 1994 poisoning incident.

A number of other petitions have since been posted by Chinese users, on topics ranging from pollution to tofu.

The online platform is designed to help Americans to petition their government.

As of 0900 GMT on Wednesday, five of the six latest petitions on the White House petitions website related to China.

The petition that led to the interest concerned the a case of a Chinese student, Zhu Ling, who was poisoned by thallium in 1994.

The petition demanded the deportation to China of a woman - described in the petition as having powerful political connections - who was investigated but not charged in connection with the case.

Since it was posted on Friday, it has gained over 135,000 signatures, surpassing the 100,000 signature threshold needed for a US government response.

The US government has not yet made any comment about the petition.

'Wishing well'
Another petition asking the US government to "remonstrate with [the] Chinese government" over a proposed factory producing paraxylene (PX) in Kunming had over 9,500 signatories.

The petitioners said they feared the plant would "jeopardise human health" because reliable "scientific assessments" had not been made, and PX was potentially carcinogenic.

The petition follows protests against the plant in Kunming, that bloggers said attracted up to 2,000 people.

The interest in online petitions comes at a time when China's internet users are increasingly turning to social media to right perceived wrongs, often using microblogs to expose what they see as corruption in officials and their family members.


Some netizens have criticised 'frivolous' petitions, such as one on the flavour of tofu
One petition was more tongue-in-cheek, asking the US government to set the official taste of tofu as sweet - an apparent reference to a debate in China over which flavour of tofu is best, while another asked the US to send troops to "liberate Chinese people".

The petitions have become a hot topic for discussion on weibo, China's version of Twitter, with several users describing the website as a "wishing well".

There were reports that weibo users had set up a new account for US President Barack Obama, referring to him as the director of the Central Petitions Office.

Many users expressed amusement at the petitions, saying they would take part in the petition to support their side in the "tofu debate".

"The White House petition site has been played to death by Chinese netizens," weibo user Sleeping Facedown noted.

Continue reading the main story
“
Start Quote

This is an outlet for the public's long-term dissatisfaction at the government's internal policies”

Buqihan
Weibo user
However, user Buqihan said that the petition site's popularity was significant.

"An opaque judicial system and a lack of credibility is a terrible thing. No wonder everyone is petitioning the White House. The situation has already gone beyond the case [of Zhu Ling], this is an outlet for the public's long-term dissatisfaction at the government's internal policies," Buqihan said.

There was also criticism of some of the frivolous petitions. "The original petition on the #WhiteHousePetitionSite was for Zhu Ling's case to be reopened, yet now it's gone crazy!" Cat from Wang Planet complained.

The petitions have caught the attention of Chinese media, with state-run China Daily featuring the petition on Zhu Ling's case on its front page.

Activists were relying on increasingly creative means to have their voices heard, China's state-run Global Times reported.

However Zhang Yiwu, a professor of Chinese literature at Peking University, said "lodging complaints to foreign entities is off limits", Global Times reported.

In China, millions of people petition government offices every year. However, they are often treated as a nuisance and many are rounded up by police to stop them complaining.


The Women's Tennis Association (WTA) has named Singapore as the host for its annual end-of-season tour championships for five years from 2014.

The championship, held in the Turkish city of Istanbul between 2011 and 2013, is considered the most prestigious event after the four Grand Slams.

The other candidates were Monterrey, in Mexico, and China's Tianjin.

The top eight singles players and top eight doubles players will compete for record prize money of $6.5m (£4.2m).

That is up from $5.5m in 2012 and $6m in 2013,

Regional strategy
"This is the largest and most significant WTA Championships partnership in our history. It's a record-breaker," said WTA chief executive Stacey Allaster.

World Sport Group (WSG), a subsidiary of Lagardere Unlimited, with support from the Singapore Sports Council and the Singapore Tourism Board (STB), represented Singapore for the winning bid.

The Singapore move is part of the WTA's stated goal of expanding women's tennis in the Asia-Pacific region.

"That was definitely one of the elements behind our decision," the WTA's Allaster told the BBC. "We want to enhance and grow our strategy in the region, with a focus on south-east Asia."

She said the award of the event to Singapore gave the country "another strategic asset" to put alongside its F1 race.

The current champion is Serena Williams, who beat Maria Sharapova in the 2012 final.

The event was first staged in 1972 and has been hosted in cities including Los Angeles, New York City, Munich, Madrid, Doha and currently Istanbul.

'Sports industry'
The move to Singapore follows other big name sports events being held there, including the Formula One Grand Prix, golf's HSBC Women's Champions and the 2010 Youth Olympic Games.

The state-of-the-art $1bn Singapore Sports Hub, located in the centre of the city, will host the championships at the 7500-seat, Singapore Indoor Stadium.

The WTA and organisers say they are looking to change the event from a tennis championships into a wider entertainment programme, with new features such as WTA Future Stars, WTA legends exhibition matches, concerts, coaching, trade symposiums, a Women in Business Leadership Conference, and daily fan festivals open to the public.

There will also be VIP events up for grabs for fans.

She said the winning bid team were "very entrepreneurial" and shared the WTA's thoughts about making the championships a leisure and lifestyle event, as well as a tennis one.

"This is an excellent opportunity for the sports industry to showcase its capabilities in hosting world class events," said Lim Teck Yin, chief executive of the Singapore Sports Council.

And analyst Ben Heyhoe Flint, head of Asia-Pacific at Fuse, Omnicom Media Group's sports and entertainment division, called the announcement "a feather in the cap" for Singapore.

"It is really impressive that they have managed to get this in the bag... it is the year-end event of a major sport," he said.

"And to get the top eight players in the world in your back yard can only be good news for everyone - the economy, tourism and brand Singapore"

State media accuse the US government of ulterior motives in raising concerns over China's military-build-up and alleged state-backed cyber-espionage.

Xinhua news agency and other party-state media have called a US Department of Defence report on China's military modernisation and alleged state-sponsored military cyber-spying "groundless speculation" that could trigger an arms race in Asia.

Liberation Army Daily says the Annual Report on Military and Security Developments Involving the People's Republic of China has undermined recently improved Sino-US military ties.

It says the report panders to arms dealers with its claims of Beijing's state-backed cyber-spying and growing military threat to Taiwan and Asian neighbours.

China Daily says the report's claims that China began "using improperly drawn straight baseline claims" in September around disputed islands known as the Diaoyu in China and the Senkakus in Japan show that the US is taking Japan's side.

"It is inappropriate as well as unacceptable for the US Department of Defence to point an accusing finger at China over the Diaoyu Islands dispute and make false accusations against China over cybersecurity," it says.

A bilingual Global Times editorial plays down the report as a mirror of the US' fears over China's growing power that cannot derail overall bilateral relations.

"Such reports can no longer really harm us. It is because we care about our reputation and the relationship between the two countries that we feel uncomfortable. As long as we have more confidence, such reports will mean nothing," the editorial concludes.

In People's Daily, historians from the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences, a state-run think-tank, are challenging Japan's sovereignty over the Ryukyu Islands, which include Okinawa.

In response to overseas media reports that the Bank of China has closed the account of North Korea's main foreign exchange bank, Shi Yinhong, an international affairs expert at Beijing's Renmin University tells Hong Kong's South China Morning Post that Beijing is losing patience with Pyongyang.

"Beijing is sending a signal to North Korean leader Kim Jong-un that he'd better stop ignoring China's demands and creating instability on the Korean Peninsula," Prof Shi says.

"Rocket promotions"
Southern Metropolis Daily raises concerns over social inequality and nepotism following a study by Beijing's Tsinghua University on the children of officials earning salaries in their first job that are 15% higher than those of their less privileged peers.

Xu Tao, a 27-year-old son of officials, was demoted yesterday after being promoted from a grassroots government staffer to deputy county head of Xiangtan in Hunan province in just five years, Global Times reports. Although an investigation in April found no irregularities, six officials involved in his promotion were punished last month.

Commentators in The Beijing News and Modern Express call on authorities to explain to a sceptical public how Xu Tao and other young people from well-connected families are able to zoom through the civil service with "rocket promotions".

Beijing Times welcomes calls by the Communist Party's disciplinary watchdog for local authorities not to intercept or detain petitioners heading to the capital to lobby the central government.

Global Times reports how a growing number of Chinese internet users fed up with limited channels to voice their grievances are resorting to posting online petitions on the White House website.

One White House website petition calls for the US government to "remonstrate" with the Chinese government after more than 1,000 people in Kunming protested against a state-run paraxylene (PX) petrochemical project last Sunday.

People's Daily says authorities must take the initiative to improve communication with the public to address pollution fears over PX plants in Kunming and elsewhere.

Sex tape scandal
In Chongqing, 21 government officials and senior managers of state-owned enterprises have been punished in connection with a sex-tape scandal last year in which they were blackmailed after their sex acts were secretly filmed, China Daily reports.

One of the 21, Lei Zhengfu, a former party chief of Chongqing's Beibei district, faces prosecution after whistle-blowing journalist Zhu Ruifeng uploaded screenshots of a video of him allegedly having sex with Zhao Hongxia, a woman hired by developers seeking favours in bids for construction projects, the newspaper adds.

"The long-awaited decision shows the government in Chongqing was forced to make the decision by the weight of public opinion. The government was papering over the problems and did not want to release information immediately and transparently," Mr Zhu tells South China Morning Post.

Xinhua, however, is dismayed at how internet users are championing Ms Zhao for exposing corrupt officials.

Alibaba, China's biggest e-commerce group, has seen its profits nearly tripled, according to a regulatory filing by shareholder Yahoo.

Net profits for the three months through December rose to $642m (£415m) from $237m a year earlier. Revenues were more than 80% higher.

Privately-held Alibaba is widely expected to have a share sale as early as this year.

The company is the biggest player in China's fast-growing e-commerce market.

The company operates online platforms Alibaba.com, Taobao and Tmall, which connect small sellers and major companies with consumers and business partners.

Alibaba's revenues come from advertisements on the websites and customer fees.

Yahoo has a 24% stake in Alibaba, after the e-commerce company bought back some of its shares last year. Included in the terms of that buyback were incentives for Alibaba to list its shares before the end of 2015.

Alibaba has not publicly announced the details or timeline of the share sale. However, industry observers expect it could be as early as this year.

The strong earnings are part of wider growth in China's ecommerce industry, which is set to surpass the US in the coming years.

China's trade growth accelerated in April, beating analyst expectations, a positive sign for the country's fragile economic recovery.

Exports surged by 14.7% compared with a year earlier. That is up from 10% in March. Imports also rose by 16.8% up from 14.1%.

The data meant a trade surplus for China, reversing a surprise deficit in March.

However, some analysts raised questions about the accuracy of the data.

"I have no strong conviction whether the data reflect reality," said Zhiwei Zhang, chief China economist at Nomura in Hong Kong.

China had a bigger-than-expected trade surplus in April of $18.2bn, after a surprise deficit of $884m in March.

'Crack down'
In recent months Chinese export data has shown positive signs of a gradual recovery in external demand.

Continue reading the main story
“
Start Quote

With Beijing tightening checks on hot money inflows disguised as trade transactions, I think the export figures in the coming months will more reflect the real underlying momentum of external demand”

Shen Lan
Standard Chartered Bank
But that is not in line with other Asian exporter countries, such as South Korea and Taiwan, which have seen their export growth weaken amid slowing global demand.

Some analysts said they suspected that some Chinese exporters may be overstating their business to avoid capital restrictions on funds they are bringing into the country.

China, which keeps a tight grip on capital flows in and out of country, has announced fresh moves to control any illegal flows.

On Sunday, the State Administration of Foreign Exchange (SAFE), China foreign exchange regulator, said it would increase its scrutiny of export invoices and impose tougher penalties on firms providing false data.

Analysts said the move indicated that the practice had become a concern for them.

"China's SAFE recently launched new rules to crack down against capital inflows disguised as trade payments. I'm suspicious about the trade data," said Mr Zhang.

Delayed recovery?
Chins has been trying to boost its economy, after the recent slowdown in its growth rate.

The world's second-largest economy saw its annual growth rate slow to 7.7% in the January to March quarter, compared with 7.9% in the last three months of 2012.

However, analysts said that while there had been some signs of a recovery, it continues to remain a fragile one.

They pointed out to the purchasing managers' index (PMI) survey released last week, which showed that growth in China's huge factory sector slowed in April as new export orders shrank.

At the same time there have been doubts that growth numbers in the first quarter may have been inflated by the over-invoicing by exporters.

Some analysts said the data over the next few months will be a more accurate indicator of China's trade growth, and the overall health of its economy.

"With Beijing tightening checks on hot money inflows disguised as trade transactions, I think the export figures in the coming months will more reflect the real underlying momentum of external demand," said Shen Lan, an economist with Standard Chartered Bank in Shanghai.

Three women have been rescued in Cleveland after being held captive for about a decade. But some experts say the hard times aren't over yet.

"ALIVE AND SAFE" screamed the front page of the Cleveland Plain Dealer, announcing the recovery of three women from a private home in the city's western district.

It was a happy ending to what is becoming an increasingly disturbing story. Amanda Berry, Gina DeJesus and Michelle Knight spent about a decade trapped in the home. Three men - Ariel Castro and his brothers, Pedro and Onil - are being questioned.

But of course, it's not really the end.

"It's not over by a long shot," says Herb Nieburg, associate professor of law and justice policy studies at Mitchell College in New London, Connecticut.

"There is a tremendous number of hours in terms of counselling and working with them for treatment of post-traumatic stress disorder."

Continue reading the main story
“
Start Quote

This will be with them for a long time, and possibly forever”

Peter Suedfeld,
Psychologist
While the women - two of whom, Berry and DeJesus, were kidnapped as teenagers - are out of physical danger, it will take much longer to make them psychologically whole.

That's because the tactics used by abductors in cases such as these are designed to make their captives feel worthless, powerless and afraid.

"Victimised women are separated by their captors from all of the people and experiences that they've had that would contribute to a) self-esteem and b) their self confidence and their identity," says Rona Fields, psychologist, sociologist and author of Against Violence Against Women: The Case for Gender as a Protected Class.

She says these patterns play out around the world, whether in Afghanistan, China or in the US.

"Relationships with their families of origin have been destroyed," she says. "The young woman captive has a sense that she's been abandoned and that she's been rejected."

Police have confirmed that the six-year-old girl found in the house was Amanda Berry's daughter. The girl was apparently born while her mother was being held.

Continue reading the main story
The sexual abuse stigma

Earlier this week, Elizabeth Smart spoke at a forum on human trafficking at Johns Hopkins University, drawing a line between her religious upbringing and the shame she felt after being sexually abused.

She said during her abduction she dwelt on lessons comparing sexually active people to chewed gum.

"I thought 'Oh my gosh, I'm that chewed up piece of gum, nobody re-chews a piece of gum. You throw it away.' And that's how easy it is to feel like you no longer have worth, you no longer have value," she said. "Why would it even be worth screaming out?"

But Nieburg says while this stigma is greater in religious circles, US culture as a whole creates an unfair and unwitting stigma around victims of sexual abuse.

"Every young woman grows up early on to think that being sexually active is not the thing your family wants for you," he says.

There were also unconfirmed reports that the other two women had suffered abuse and beatings.

This mix of sexual and physical violence can further contribute to a sense of danger, a learned obedience and a damaged psyche that can linger after the abuse ends.

"The sexual abuse is humiliating, demeaning, makes you feel not very good about yourself," says Nieburg. "It instils a sense of hopelessness."

That mix has been on display in previous cases of missing girls, most notably Elizabeth Smart and Jaycee Dugard.

Smart was 14 when she was taken from her bed in the middle of the night by Brian David Mitchell, who claimed her as his bride and repeatedly sexually assaulted her over a nine-month period. Dugard was kidnapped by Phillip Garrido on her way to school at age 11, and imprisoned for 18 years, giving birth to two children in the process.

Both Smart and Dugard had several opportunities to draw attention to themselves and their captors. Mitchell took Smart to parties in the Salt Lake City area, and they ate together at restaurants. Dugard spoke to Garrido's parole officer and worked at his printing business.

When finally confronted by law enforcement, it took time and pressure for both women to admit their true identities.

Such a situation is not uncommon among those who have been held against their will for long periods of time.

"Usually there is some physical restraint, but eventually that's substituted for by the techniques similar to what cults use: mind control, threats," says Nieburg.

Victims can lose their sense of perspective after years of abuse.

"There can be such a wide range of abuse that a victim who is no longer viciously abused may feel gratitude" towards their captor, says Peter Suedfeld, professor emeritus of psychology at the University of British Columbia.

"On the other hand, they're also afraid that if they try to escape and fail, all those conditions which are at the moment tolerable will become intolerable."

Indeed, Dugard told Diane Sawyer that she didn't try to escape because: "What I knew was safe. The unknown out there was terrifying."


Well-wishers deliver a token of respect outside the home of Amanda Berry's sister. The public support could be overwhelming for women held in captivity for so long
Berry did try to escape - and in doing so, was able to free herself, her daughter, and the two other women in the house.

Her call to 911 may have been telling. "I'm Amanda Berry," she said. "I've been on the news for the last 10 years."

That sense of self - and that people were looking for her - may have helped give her the confidence to leave.

"There is a sense of abandonment if you think the search has stopped," says Suedfeld, and that fear is often played up by abductors, who tell captors their families have stopped looking.

But Berry knew she hadn't been forgotten, and that may have given her the strength to fight for freedom.

Nevertheless, women who are rescued from this type situation are never fully free - not at first. The damage inflicted on them by their captors takes years to address.

"This will be with them for a long time, and possibly forever," says Suedfeld. "They are going to have nightmares. They may feel suspicious of other people, strangers, men in particular."

They will have to readjust from a life in captivity to a life in the real world, complete with sounds, smells and people crowding around them.

"They are basically bombarded with stimulation after a long time of having very little," he says.

For Austrian Elisabeth Fritzl, who escaped from a basement cell where she was raped by her father for 24 years, one of the hardest transitions was living with full lighting and spacious rooms.

It took 10 years for the three women in Cleveland to find their way out of the door and into the light. And it may take them many more years to 

The latest trade figures from China are exported to show a rise in commodity imports.

But the increase won't be across the board - government measures to cool the property market have meant a slowing of the flow of raw materials into the building sector.

Recent figures also show that copper imports fell by 37% in March, compared to the same month in 2012.

David Lennox from Fat Prophets in Sydney feels that iron ore imports will have been slightly higher in April.

North Korea will no longer be rewarded for provocative behaviour, US President Barack Obama has said at a joint news conference with South Korea's leader.

Flanked by President Park Geun-hye, Mr Obama told a White House briefing North Korea was more isolated than ever.

Ms Park is on her first foreign trip since taking office in February.

Ahead of their meeting, US officials said North Korea had moved two medium-range missiles from a coastal launch site, lowering tensions.

'Deterrent'
Continue reading the main story
“
Start Quote

The international community must consistently send the message with one voice, to tell them... that they have no choice but to change”

Park Geun-hye
President, South Korea
"The days when North Korea could create a crisis and elicit concessions, those days are over," Mr Obama told Tuesday's briefing after meeting privately with Ms Park in the Oval Office.

He added: "President Park and myself very much share the view that we are going to maintain a strong deterrent, we're not going to reward provocative behaviour, but we remain open to the prospect of North Korea taking a peaceful path.

"So far, at least, we haven't seen actions on the part of the North Koreans that would indicate they're prepared to move in a different direction," he said.

The visit by Ms Park, South Korea's first female president, came as the US and South Korea mark 60 years of their military alliance.

Tension
Ms Park said her country would not tolerate what she called North Korean aggression and escalation.

"Instead of just hoping to see North Korea change, the international community must consistently send the message with one voice, to tell them and communicate to them that they have no choice but to change,'' she said.

Pyongyang was believed to have been preparing for a missile launch last month, having threatened attacks in the region.

The threats followed tough new UN sanctions imposed on North Korea in March after its third nuclear test.

North Korea has also been angered by wide-ranging annual US-South Korea military drills, which ended a week ago.

Meanwhile, the state-owned Bank of China said it was halting transactions from North Korea's Foreign Trade Bank on Tuesday.

It is thought to be the first time that a Chinese entity has made a move against North Korean interests following the recent tension.

Somalia's President Hassan Sheikh Mohamud says Somalia has entered a new era that will herald the end of more than two decades of conflict.

He was speaking at a major international conference in London to help Somalia rebuild itself.

The UK and other donors pledged some $130m (£84m) in aid for Somalia.

UK Prime Minister David Cameron said huge progress was being made in curbing piracy and tackling an Islamist insurgency in Somalia.

Somalia is widely regarded as a failed state, hit by numerous conflicts since the overthrow of long-serving ruler Siad Barre in 1991.

The United Nations (UN) estimates that nearly 260,000 people died during a famine in the East African state from 2010 to 2012.

'Government's writ'
Al-Shabab, which is linked to al-Qaeda, still controls much of the country.

The government depends on about 18,000 African Union (AU) troops to stay in power.

Continue reading the main story

Analysis
Andrew Harding
Africa correspondent
A year ago, Afgoye was under the control of Somalia's Islamist militant group, al-Shabab, which held most of the countryside beyond Mogadishu.

But if they have lost control of many key towns these days, al-Shabab can still cause trouble.

Minutes after I'd flown into Mogadishu, a car bomb exploded up the road at a busy roundabout, killing or injuring more than 30 people.

Read more from Andrew
Andrew Harding: Somalia's struggle for unity
Mr Cameron said UK security was threatened by radicalism that was "poisoning young Somali minds".

"If we ignore it we will be making the same mistakes in Somalia that we made in Afghanistan in the 1990s. I'm not prepared to let that happen," Mr Cameron said.

Mr Mohamud said there had been a paradigm shift in Somalia since his government took office last year.

"Soon, Somalia will be a different place, a better place," he said.

Mr Mohamud was chosen by MPs in September 2012.

Mr Cameron said the UK and other countries - including China, the US and South Africa - had agreed to contribute £50m ($77m) to help Somalia rebuild its security forces so they could tackle insurgents and criminal networks.

The European Union said it had pledged $58m towards the initiative.

"In Somalia, like anywhere else, there can be no development without security," it said in a statement.

The meeting follows similar conferences in London and the Turkish city of Istanbul last year, amid growing international concern that Somalia had turned into a haven for al-Qaeda-linked militants.


BBC Somali's Farhan Jimale outlines what people need to know about Somalia
The new government is the first one in more than two decades to be recognised by the US, the International Monetary Fund (IMF) and other key players who are attending the conference.

In a BBC interview, Mr Cameron said Somalia was "one of the most broken countries in the world" and the "writ of the government, as it stands today, doesn't run a long way outside Mogadishu, but at least it has a government, it's making a start and I think we're seeing some real progress".

'Tackling corruption'
Continue reading the main story
Precarious future

In pictures: Surviving camp life in Mogadishu
Mr Cameron also held talks with Kenya's President Uhuru Kenyatta, who is attending the conference - his first visit to a Western country since his election in March.

The UK had said it would have limited contact with him, as he been charged by the International Criminal Court (ICC) with crimes against humanity over his alleged role in fuelling violence after the disputed 2007 election - charges he denies.

Mr Cameron defended meeting Mr Kenyatta, saying he was co-operating with the ICC and Kenya was playing a vital role, along with other regional states, to beat back al-Shabab in Somalia.

The leaders of Ethiopia and Uganda, which have troops in Somalia fighting al-Shabab, were also at the conference.


Mr Mohamud told the BBC that he envisaged the withdrawal of the AU force within two years.

BBC Somalia analyst Mary Harper says Mr Mohamud's estimate appears to be optimistic, as he is little more than the president of the capital, Mogadishu.

The Somali army is made up of clan militias with questionable loyalty, she says.

Somalia is also divided into a patchwork of self-governing regions, many of them hostile to the central government.

The breakaway state of Somaliland and the semi-autonomous region of Puntland have boycotted the conference.

Somalia's government is also totally dependent on foreign aid, and has so far refused to agree to set up a joint oversight mechanism to curb corruption, our correspondent says.

But Mr Cameron told the BBC the government had "signed up to an awful lot of new measures" to ensure that it accounted for aid money.


President Hassan Sheikh Mohamud: "We are working hard to reform our country"
He added that "huge progress" was being made in Somalia.

Piracy was down by 80% this year with no vessel attacked so far, Mr Cameron said.

However, the World Bank estimated in a report in April report that piracy emanating from the Horn of Africa nation may still cost the world economy $18bn a year, he added.

"Britain will also support the new maritime strategy enabling full radio connection all along the entire coastline for the first time in 20 years," Mr Cameron said.

North Korea has removed two medium-range missiles from a coastal launch site, indicating a lowering of tension on the peninsula, a US official said.

Pyongyang was believed to be preparing for a launch last month, having threatened attacks in the region.

The threats followed tough new UN sanctions imposed on North Korea in March after its third nuclear test.

North Korea has been angered by wide-ranging annual US-South Korea military drills, which ended a week ago.

The news that the missiles had been removed from the site on the east coast came on the eve of a summit in Washington between the US and South Korean presidents.

Continue reading the main story
Musudan missile
The Musudan, also known as the Nodong-B or the Taepodong-X, is an intermediate-range ballistic missile. Its likely targets are Okinawa, Japan, and US bases in the Pacific
Range estimates differ dramatically. Israeli intelligence suggests 2,500km, while the US Missile Defense Agency estimates 3,200km; other sources put the upper limit at 4,000km
These differences are due in large part to the fact that the missile has never been tested publicly, according to the Center for Nonproliferation Studies. Its payload is also unknown
Missile defences in the region
North Korea's missile programme
Park Geun-hye held talks with Barack Obama on Tuesday.

Alongside the South Korean leader, Mr Obama said at the White House that North Korea would no longer be allowed to raise tensions to wrangle concessions.

"The days when North Korea could create a crisis and elicit concessions, those days are over," Mr Obama said.

Ms Park, who took office in February, will also address the US Congress on Wednesday.

'Provocation pause'
The Musudan missiles had been ready to launch at any moment but North Korea had now "moved them", a unnamed US defence official told AFP news agency.

A report from South Korea's Yonhap news agency, citing an unnamed senior government source, backed that up, saying Pyongyang appeared to have lifted its highest combat alert and moved the missiles, although their current location was not confirmed.

The move is the most tangible sign yet that North Korea has stepped back from its threats to launch missiles, the BBC's Jane Little in Washington reports.

But a senior US official from the National Security Council warned that, given the North's unpredictable behaviour, it was "premature to celebrate it as good news".

Pentagon spokesman George Little, who declined to comment directly on the missiles' reported removal, told reporters "what we have seen recently is a provocation pause".

"And we think that's obviously beneficial to efforts to ensure we have peace and stability on the Korean peninsula."

China bank move
Meanwhile, the Beijing-based Bank of China said it was halting transactions from North Korea's Foreign Trade Bank.

The US imposed sanctions on North Korea's main foreign exchange bank after the recent nuclear tests and had urged other countries, including China, to cut ties with the bank.

The Bank of China made the announcement in a statement but did not provide further details.

This is the first time that a Chinese entity has made a move against North Korean interests following the recent tension, according to reports.

Continue reading the main story
Timeline: Korean tensions
12 Dec: North launches a rocket, claiming to have put a satellite into orbit
12 Feb: North conducts underground nuclear test
11 Mar: US-South Korea annual military drills begin
30 Mar: North says it is entering a "state of war" with South
2 Apr: North says it is restarting Yongbyon reactor
3 Apr: North blocks South workers from Kaesong industrial zone, then on 9 Apr pulls its workers out
10 Apr: North moves two mid-range Musudan missiles to its east coast
26 Apr: Seoul announces withdrawal of all remaining South Korean workers from Kaesong
2 May: North Korea jails US man for 15 years
Q&A: Kaesong Industrial Complex
Picking apart the bluster
North Korea unveiled medium-range Musudan missiles during a military parade in 2010 but had not yet tested them.

Last month, South Korea raised its alert level to "vital threat" amid indications that Pyongyang was preparing for a launch.

At least one ballistic missile with an estimated 3,000km (2,000-mile) range had been fuelled and ready for launch, according to US and South Korean sources.

A test launch would be a violation of UN Security Council Resolution 1718, passed in 2006, which states the North "must not conduct any further nuclear test or launch of a ballistic missile".

Pyongyang had issued a series of threats in apparent response to the expanded UN sanctions and the US-South Korea drills - which saw nuclear-capable B2 and B52 bombers flown over the Korean peninsula.

These included warnings of attacks on Japan, South Korea and US military bases in the region, and a pledge to restart a mothballed nuclear reactor that produced plutonium for its weapons programme.

In addition, it shut down an emergency military hotline between Seoul and Pyongyang, and later withdrew some 53,000 workers in April from the Kaesong factory zone on the border with South Korea.

The industrial complex, which was launched in 2003, employed people from both countries and was seen as one of the last remaining symbols of inter-Korean co-operation.

The final South Korean workers left the factory last week - the first time they have done so since the zone began operating 10 years ago.

However the tone of the rhetoric from North Korea has softened somewhat in recent days, observers say.

David Cameron aims to visit China this year, Downing Street has said, following reports the prime minister has been barred from the country.

Officials in Beijing are said to be angry that Mr Cameron met the Dalai Lama last year.

But Number 10 said no ban was in place and the government wanted to foster a "stronger relationship" with China.

Mr Cameron and Deputy Prime Minister Nick Clegg met the Dalai Lama at St Paul's Cathedral in London.

The Buddhist spiritual leader is seeking a measure of independence from China for his homeland of Tibet.

'Not pressure'
Mr Cameron's spokesman said: "It is entirely reasonable for the prime minister to decide who he meets.

"The Chinese government always lobbies hard against any meetings between foreign governments and the Dalai Lama. We have made clear in advance to the Chinese government that British ministers will decide who they meet and when they meet them."

Asked whether the prime minister felt under pressure from Beijing to apologise, his spokesman replied: "Not pressure, no."

Questioned over whether Mr Cameron was effectively banned from China, he said: "No. I believe the prime minister aims to go before the end of the year."

He declined to reveal whether dates for a proposed visit had been discussed, but said: "We regularly discuss issues of mutual interest and importance with the Chinese.

"The prime minister has recently had warm engagements with both the (Chinese Communist) party secretary and premier. Government ministers have had around 14 meetings with their Chinese counterparts since May last year."

The spokesman added that UK exports to China had grown more than those of any other EU country last year.

He said: "We want to establish a stronger relationship with China, recognising that it is in the interests of both countries to manage our differences with respect and co-operate as much as possible."

The meeting between Mr Cameron, Mr Clegg and the Dalai Lama had been part of the government's approach of seeking "dialogue and discussion and gathering a wide range of viewpoints on issues of importance", said the spokesman.

Mr Clegg told Sky News: "We have a very important economic relationship with them [China]. But that doesn't mean we should somehow give up on what we believe in when it comes to human rights and freedoms which we will continue to express in a respectful but nonetheless firm way."

Danish brewer Carlsberg has returned to profit in the first quarter of the year, helped by strong sales in Asia.

The world's fourth largest brewer reported a net profit of 62m kroner ($10.9m; £7m), compared with a loss of 76m kroner a year earlier.

Sales in Asia were up 13%, and the region now make up 20% of Carlsberg's group revenues.

Carlsberg's brands include Tuborg, Kronenbourg, Baltika and Holsten Pilsner.

In common with other leading global brewers, Carlsberg has increasingly been looking to Asia to boost sales and offset weakness in more mature markets, such as the eurozone.

Recent figures for parts of Asia have shown the rate of economic growth slowing.

But Carlsberg's chief executive, Jorgen Buhl Rasmussen, said he still expected the Asian market to show rapid growth this year.

"I see no reason that the picture from 2012 should change significantly in 2013," he said.

Sales were particularly strong in Vietnam, Cambodia and India.

The company also has a joint venture in the China's Chongqing Jianiang Brewery, where it has recently increased its share.

On Sunday, India and China began pulling back troops from disputed territory near their ill-defined border in the Ladakh region of the Himalayas after a stand-off lasting nearly a month. Senior Indian journalist Subir Bhaumik, who was travelling in China last week, reports on the mood in the country.

China has much more to do with India than fight over a de facto border where, as former Indian Prime Minister Jawaharlal Nehru had said, "not a blade of grass grows".

"We have a problem with the border, no denying it. But we want it solved. That may take a while, but we do not want our relations to suffer," says Kong Can, chief of the Development Research Centre in China's south-western Yunnan province and a senior Communist party official.

Kong Can wants border trade with India to flourish, the way it has with some of China's other neighbours.

China is already one of India's top trading partners: the two sides have agreed a new $100bn (£65bn) bilateral trade target for 2015, up from over $66bn in 2012.

"The volume of trade will go up further if we can develop border trade," said Kong Can.

'Huge trading bloc'
With more than a third of the world's population living in India and China, the two countries can be "one huge trading bloc", says Li Zhu of the Yunnan University of Finance and Economics.

Yunnan is China's gateway province, crucial to its strategy to forge close trade and cultural ties with neighbouring countries in south-east and South Asia.


Yunnan is hoping for Indian investments
"From Yunnan we are developing a whole network of highways, rail links and waterways to Vietnam, Laos, Thailand and Burma," said Kong Can's colleague, Yang Ye.

He said China was also keen on reopening the old Stillwell Road, through which the allies used to send supplies to China during WWII.

The road begins in India's tea-producing state of Assam. It passes through the dense forests of the neighbouring state of Arunachal Pradesh and Upper Burma's Kachin state before reaching Yunnan.

But India has security reservations about reopening the road.

China, Mr Yang says, is keen to develop transport links from Yunnan to eastern India and Bangladesh.

Also, Kong Can says, China seeks "Indian investments in Yunnan, mainly in [the] pharmaceutical and information technology [industries]". He would be also happy to see an Indian consulate in the city of Kunming.

Beside boosting trade and business ties, China seeks closer relations with India for other reasons.

'More nuanced'
If Sino-Indian ties worsen, India could well be firmly drawn towards the US, a possibility that worries Beijing considerably, say analysts.

"If we have bad relations, there are many to take advantage," says Zhou Yunxiang, who leads a Yunnan research group in sub-regional studies.

China-watcher Binoda Mishra of the Calcutta-based Centre for Studies in International Relations and Development says that Chinese policy towards India "appears to be more nuanced than many imagine in India".

"Military commanders may push hard on the border to seek some tactical advantage but the top leaders in Beijing are aware of India's importance as a growing market and a balancing factor in Asia," he says.

The tension points will remain: the disputed border, Tibet and much else.

China has a domestic nationalist constituency to address, but, unlike in India, the 1962 month-long border war is hardly in the public memory.

"We have a huge problem with Japan for historical reasons but not with India. We like you people," Yunnan university student Li Hsun told me.

General Motors has won approval from China to build a $1.3bn (£835m) plant to make Cadillac cars in the country.

The move is a major boost for GM, which has been keen to increase its share of the luxury car market in China, currently dominated by Audi and BMW.

Manufacturing in China should help GM bring down the cost of its cars, not least because Beijing imposes a steep duty imports of luxury vehicles.

China is the world's second largest economy and its biggest car market.

Demand for luxury cars in the country has been growing as income levels have risen.

However, GM has not been able to tap into this fast-growing segment of the market. The carmaker sold close to 30,000 Cadillac cars in China in 2012, whereas both BMW and Audi sell more than 300,000 vehicles there.

Earlier this year, GM said in its annual report that "growing Cadillac sales in China is a priority".

"Our goal is to triple sales to 100,000 units within two years," it added.

The carmaker said construction of the new plant - which will have the capacity to make 150,000 vehicles a year - would begin in June.

China's government and military have targeted US government computers as part of a cyber espionage campaign, a US report on China says.

Intrusions were focused on collecting intelligence on US diplomatic, economic and defence sectors which could benefit China's own defence programme, it says.

This is the first time the Pentagon's annual report has directly linked such attacks to the Beijing government.

China called the report "groundless", saying it represented "US distrust".

A report from state news agency Xinhua cited Sr Col Wang Xinjun, a People's Liberation Army (PLA) researcher, describing the report as "irresponsible and harmful to the mutual trust between the two countries".

Both China and the US were victims of cybercrimes and should work together to tackle the problems, the agency quoted him as saying.

Continue reading the main story
Analysis

Jonathan Marcus
BBC Diplomatic Correspondent
This is the most explicit US statement so far charging that it is the Chinese government and military that are behind at least some of the many intrusions into US government computer systems.

It marks a general toughening of the US position over the course of this year. President Barack Obama raised the cyber-security threat in a telephone call to Chinese President Xi Jinping in March. The issue figured prominently when US Treasury Secretary Jacob Lew visited Beijing a few days later.

There have long been fears about China's ability to steal technical and industrial secrets But this latest Pentagon report warns that China's activities go well beyond this "building a picture of US defence networks, logistics and related military capabilities that could be exploited during a crisis."

US experts believe that China's "area denial" strategy - its effort to push US naval forces well away from its shores - could have a significant cyber dimension.

Of course the United States is also rapidly developing capabilities to counter-cyber attacks and to go on the offensive itself. Indeed this is a field where the boundaries between offence and defence are blurred. US Cyber Command is expanding rapidly. The US and others are thought to be behind a number of computer virus attacks against elements of Iran's nuclear programme; a small glimpse of what the future of warfare may look like.

The Pentagon report also criticises a "lack of transparency" in China's military modernisation programme and defence spending.

'Exfiltrating information'
"In 2012, numerous computer systems around the world, including those owned by the US government, continued to be targeted for intrusions, some of which appear to be attributable directly to the Chinese government and military," the report from the US Department of Defense said.

The attacks were focused on "exfiltrating information" that "could potentially be used to benefit China's defence industry, high technology industries... and military planners," it said.

It added that this was particularly concerning because the "skills required for these intrusions are similar to those necessary to conduct computer network attacks".

While China has long been suspected of a role in cyber attacks, the US has generally avoided publicly attributing attacks to the Chinese government, or confirming that US government computers have been targeted.

But the issue has come under increased scrutiny in recent months.

In February, US cyber security firm Mandiant said that it had linked hundreds of data breaches since 2004 to a Chinese hacking team traced to the site of a military unit in Shanghai.

China called the Mandiant report flawed, and said it was opposed to cyber-crime.

'Increased assertiveness'
Continue reading the main story
What is Unit 61398?

A unit of China's People's Liberation Army, to whose Shanghai address US cyber security firm Mandiant says it traced a prolific hacking team
The team was said to have hacked into 141 computers across 20 industries, stealing hundreds of terabytes of data
Mandiant says the team would have been staffed by hundreds, possibly thousands of proficient English speakers
China said Mandiant's report was flawed and lacked proof
The report also analyses China's progress in modernising its military and says that a "lack of transparency" about its military capabilities has heightened regional tensions.

China announced in March that its annual defence budget was $114bn (£73bn), an increase of 10.4%.

However, the Pentagon estimated that China's total military expenditure in 2012 was higher, between $135bn (£83bn) and $215bn (£138bn).

China launched its first aircraft carrier in 2012, and is also investing in ballistic missiles, counter-space weapons and military cyberspace systems, the report said.

Defense Department official David Helvey said that while none of the individual weapons systems were an issue, the "integration and overlapping nature" of the systems left the department "concerned".

They could boost China's ability to restrict access to, and military operations in, the Western Pacific, he said.

Mr Helvey said the report also found that China had "increased assertiveness with respect to its maritime territorial claims" over the past year.

China has territorial disputes with many of its neighbours, including in both the South China Sea and East China Sea.